 _Chapter 1_
 The Tower of Cirith Ungol
 Sam roused himself painfully from the ground. For a moment he wondered where he was, and
then all the misery and despair returned to him. He was in the deep dark outside the under-gate of
the orcs' stronghold; its brazen doors were shut. He must have fallen stunned when he hurled
himself against them; but how long he had lain there he did not know. Then he had been on fire,
desperate and furious; now he was shivering and cold. He crept to the doors and pressed his ears
against them.
 Far within he could hear faintly the voices of ores clamouring, but soon they stopped or passed
out of hearing, and all was still. His head ached and his eyes saw phantom lights in the darkness,
but he struggled to steady himself and think. It was clear at any rate that he had no hope of getting
into the orc-hold by that gate; he might wait there for days before it was opened, and he could not
wait: time was desperately precious. He no longer had any doubt about his duty: he must rescue his
master or perish in the attempt.
 'The perishing is more likely, and will be a lot easier anyway,' he said grimly to himself, as he
sheathed Sting and turned from the brazen doors. Slowly he groped his way back in the dark along
the tunnel, not daring to use the elven-light; and as he went he tried to fit together the events since
Frodo and he had left the Cross-roads. He wondered what the time was. Somewhere between one
day and the next, he supposed; but even of the days he had quite lost count. He was in a land of
darkness where the days of the world seemed forgotten, and where all who entered were forgotten
too.
 'I wonder if they think of us at all,' he said, 'and what is happening to them all away there.' He
waved his hand vaguely in the air before him; but he was in fact now facing southwards, as he
came back to Shelob's tunnel, not west. Out westward in the world it was drawing to noon upon the
fourteenth day of March in the Shire-reckoning. And even now Aragorn was leading the black fleet
from Pelargir, and Merry was riding with the Rohirrim down the Stonewain Valley, while in Minas
Tirith flames were rising and Pippin watched the madness growing in the eyes of Denethor. Yet
amid all their cares and fear the thoughts of their friends turned constantly to Frodo and Sam. They
were not forgotten. But they were far beyond aid, and no thought could yet bring any help to
Samwise Hamfast's son; he was utterly alone.
 He came back at last to the stone door of the orc-passage, and still unable to discover the catch
or bolt that held it, he scrambled over as before and dropped softly to the ground. Then he made his
way stealthily to the outlet of Shelob's tunnel, where the rags of her great web were still blowing
and swaying in the cold airs. For cold they seemed to Sam after the noisome darkness behind; but
the breath of them revived him. He crept cautiously out.
 All was ominously quiet. The light was no more than that of dusk at a dark day's end. The vast
vapours that arose in Mordor and went streaming westward passed low overhead, a great welter of
cloud and smoke now lit again beneath with a sullen glow of red.
 Sam looked up towards the orc-tower, and suddenly from its narrow windows lights stared out
like small red eyes. He wondered if they were some signal. His fear of the orcs, forgotten for a
while in his wrath and desperation, now returned. As far as he could see, there was only one
possible course for him to take: he must go on and try to find the main entrance to the dreadful
tower; but his knees felt weak, and he found that he was trembling. Drawing his eyes down from
the tower and the horns of the Cleft before him, he forced his unwilling feet to obey him, and
slowly, listening with all his ears, peering into the dense shadows of the rocks beside the way, he
retraced his steps, past the place where Frodo fell, and still the stench of Shelob lingered, and then
on and up, until he stood again in the very cleft where he had put on the Ring and seen Shagrat's
company go by.
 There he halted and sat down. For the moment he could drive himself no further. He felt that if
once he went beyond the crown of the pass and took one step veritably down into the land of
Mordor, that step would be irrevocable. He could never come back. Without any clear purpose he
drew out the Ring and put it on again. Immediately he felt the great burden of its weight, and felt
afresh, but now more strong and urgent than ever, the malice of the Eye of Mordor, searching,
trying to pierce the shadows that it had made for its own defence, but which now hindered it in its
unquiet and doubt.
 As before, Sam found that his hearing was sharpened, but that to his sight the things of this
world seemed thin and vague. The rocky walls of the path were pale, as if seen through a mist, but
still at a distance he heard the bubbling of Shelob in her misery: and harsh and clear, and very close
it seemed, he heard cries and the clash of metal. He sprang to his feet, and pressed himself against
the wall beside the road. He was glad of the Ring, for here was yet another company of orcs on the
march. Or so at first he thought. Then suddenly he realized that it was not so, his hearing had
deceived him: the orc-cries came from the tower, whose topmost horn was now right above him, on
the left hand of the Cleft.
 Sam shuddered and tried to force himself to move. There was plainly some devilry going on.
Perhaps in spite of all orders the cruelty of the orcs had mastered them, and they were tormenting
Frodo, or even savagely hacking him to pieces. He listened; and as he did a gleam of hope came to
him. There could not be much doubt: there was fighting in the tower, the orcs must be at war
among themselves, Shagrat and Gorbag had come to blows. Faint as was the hope that his guess
brought him, it was enough to rouse him. There might be just a chance. His love for Frodo rose
above all other thoughts, and forgetting his peril he cried aloud: 'I'm coming, Mr. Frodo!'
 He ran forward to the climbing path, and over it. At once the road turned left and plunged
steeply down. Sam had crossed into Mordor.
 He took off the Ring, moved it may be by some deep premonition of danger, though to himself
he thought only that he wished to see more clearly. `Better have a look at the worst,' he muttered.
`No good blundering about in a fog!'
 Hard and cruel and bitter was the land that met his gaze. Before his feet the highest ridge of the
Ephel Dúath fell steeply in great cliffs down into a dark trough, on the further side of which there
rose another ridge, much lower, its edge notched and jagged with crags like fangs that stood out
black against the red light behind them: it was the grim Morgai, the inner ring of the fences of the
land. Far beyond it, but almost straight ahead, across a wide lake of darkness dotted with tiny fires,
there was a great burning glow; and from it rose in huge columns a swirling smoke, dusty red at the
roots, black above where it merged into the billowing canopy that roofed in all the accursed land.
 Sam was looking at Orodruin, the Mountain of Fire. Ever and anon the furnaces far below its
ashen cone would grow hot and with a great surging and throbbing pour forth rivers of molten rock
from chasms in its sides. Some would flow blazing towards Barad-dûr down great channels; some
would wind their way into the stony plain, until they cooled and lay like twisted dragon-shapes
vomited from the tormented earth. In such an hour of labour Sam beheld Mount Doom, and the
light of it, cut off by the high screen of the Ephel Dúath from those who climbed up the path from
the West, now glared against the stark rock faces, so that they seemed to be drenched with blood.
 In that dreadful light Sam stood aghast, for now, looking to his left, he could see the Tower of
Cirith Ungol in all its strength. The horn that he had seen from the other side was only its topmost
turret. Its eastern face stood up in three great tiers from a shelf in the mountain-wall far below; its
back was to a great cliff behind, from which it jutted out in pointed bastions, one above the other,
diminishing as they rose, with sheer sides of cunning masonry that looked north-east and south-east.
About the lowest tier, two hundred feet below where Sam now stood, there was a battlemented wall
enclosing a narrow court. Its gate, upon the near south-eastern side, opened on a broad road, the
outer parapet of which ran upon the brink of a precipice, until it turned southward and went
winding down into the darkness to join the road that came over the Morgul Pass. Then on it went
through a jagged rift in the Morgai out into the valley of Gorgoroth and away to Barad-dûr. The
narrow upper way on which Sam stood leapt swiftly down by stair and steep path to meet the main
road under the frowning walls close to the Tower-gate.
 As he gazed at it suddenly Sam understood, almost with a shock, that this stronghold had been
built not to keep enemies out of Mordor, but to keep them in. It was indeed one of the works of
Gondor long ago, an eastern outpost of the defences of Ithilien, made when, after the Last Alliance,
Men of Westernesse kept watch on the evil land of Sauron where his creatures still lurked. But as
with Narchost and Carchost, the Towers of the Teeth, so here too the vigilance had failed, and
treachery had yielded up the Tower to the Lord of the Ringwraiths, and now for long years it had
been held by evil things. Since his return to Mordor, Sauron had found it useful; for he had few
servants but many slaves of fear, and still its chief purpose as of old was to prevent escape from
Mordor. Though if an enemy were so rash as to try to enter that land secretly, then it was also a last
unsleeping guard against any that might pass the vigilance of Morgul and of Shelob.
 Only too clearly Sam saw how hopeless it would be for him to creep down under those manyeyed walls
and pass the watchful gate. And even if he did so, he could not go far on the guarded
road beyond: not even the black shadows, lying deep where the red glow could not reach, would
shield him long from the night-eyed orcs. But desperate as that road might be, his task was now far
worse: not to avoid the gate and escape, but to enter it, alone.
 His thought turned to the Ring, but there was no comfort there, only dread and danger. No
sooner had he come in sight of Mount Doom, burning far away, than he was aware of a change in
his burden. As it drew near the great furnaces where, in the deeps of time, it had been shaped and
forged, the Ring's power grew, and it became more fell, untameable save by some mighty will. As
Sam stood there, even though the Ring was not on him but hanging by its chain about his neck, he
felt himself enlarged, as if he were robed in a huge distorted shadow of himself, a vast and ominous
threat halted upon the walls of Mordor. He felt that he had from now on only two choices: to
forbear the Ring, though it would torment him; or to claim it, and challenge the Power that sat in its
dark hold beyond the valley of shadows. Already the Ring tempted him, gnawing at his will and
reason. Wild fantasies arose in his mind; and he saw Samwise the Strong, Hero of the Age, striding
with a flaming sword across the darkened land, and armies flocking to his call as he marched to the
overthrow of Barad-dûr. And then all the clouds rolled away, and the white sun shone, and at his
command the vale of Gorgoroth became a garden of flowers and trees and brought forth fruit. He
had only to put on the Ring and claim it for his own, and all this could be.
 In that hour of trial it was the love of his master that helped most to hold him firm; but also deep
down in him lived still unconquered his plain hobbit-sense: he knew in the core of his heart that he
was not large enough to bear such a burden, even if such visions were not a mere cheat to betray
him. The one small garden of a free gardener was all his need and due, not a garden swollen to a
realm; his own hands to use, not the hands of others to command.
 'And anyway all these notions are only a trick,' he said to himself. 'He'd spot me and cow me,
before I could so much as shout out. He'd spot me, pretty quick, if I put the Ring on now, in Mordor.
Well, all I can say is: things look as hopeless as a frost in spring. Just when being invisible would
be really useful, I can't use the Ring! And if ever I get any further, it's going to be nothing but a
drag and a burden every step. So what's to be done?'
 He was not really in any doubt. He knew that he must go down to the gate and not linger any
more. With a shrug of his shoulders, as if to shake off the shadow and dismiss the phantoms, he
began slowly to descend. With each step he seemed to diminish. He had not gone far before he had
shrunk again to a very small and frightened hobbit. He was now passing under the very walls of the
Tower, and the cries and sounds of fighting could be heard with his unaided ears. At the moment
the noise seemed to be coming from the court behind the outer wall.
 Sam was about half way down the path when out of the dark gateway into the red glow there
came two orcs running. They did not turn towards him. They were making for the main road; but
even as they ran they stumbled and fell to the ground and lay still. Sam had seen no arrows, but he
guessed that the orcs had been shot down by others on the battlements or hidden in the shadow of
the gate. He went on, hugging the wall on his left. One look upward had shown him that there was
no hope of climbing it. The stone-work rose thirty feet, without a crack or ledge, to overhanging
courses like inverted steps. The gate was the only way.
 He crept on; and as he went he wondered how many orcs lived in the Tower with Shagrat, and
how many Gorbag had, and what they were quarrelling about, if that was what was happening.
Shagrat's company had seemed to be about forty, and Gorbag's more than twice as large; but of
course Shagrat's patrol had only been a part of his garrison. Almost certainly they were quarrelling
about Frodo, and the spoil. For a second Sam halted, for suddenly things seemed clear to him,
almost as if he had seen them with his eyes. The mithril coat! Of course, Frodo was wearing it, and
they would find it. And from what Sam had heard Gorbag would covet it. But the orders of the
Dark Tower were at present Frodo's only protection, and if they were set aside, Frodo might be
killed out of hand at any moment.
 'Come on, you miserable sluggard!' Sam cried to himself. `Now for it!' He drew Sting and ran
towards the open gate. But just as he was about to pass under its great arch he felt a shock: as if he
had run into some web like Shelob's, only invisible. He could see no obstacle, but something too
strong for his will to overcome barred the way. He looked about, and then within the shadow of the
gate he saw the Two Watchers.
 They were like great figures seated upon thrones. Each had three joined bodies, and three heads
facing outward, and inward, and across the gateway. The heads had vulture-faces, and on their
great knees were laid clawlike hands. They seemed to be carved out of huge blocks of stone,
immovable, and yet they were aware: some dreadful spirit of evil vigilance abode in them. They
knew an enemy. Visible or invisible none could pass unheeded. They would forbid his entry, or his
escape.
 Hardening his will Sam thrust forward once again, and halted with a jerk, staggering as if from a
blow upon his breast and head. Then greatly daring, because he could think of nothing else to do,
answering a sudden thought that came to him, he drew slowly out the phial of Galadriel and held it
up. Its white light quickened swiftly, and the shadows under the dark arch fled. The monstrous
Watchers sat there cold and still, revealed in all their hideous shape. For a moment Sam caught a
glitter in the black stones of their eyes, the very malice of which made him quail; but slowly he felt
their will waver and crumble into fear.
 He sprang past them; but even as he did so, thrusting the phial back into his bosom, he was
aware, as plainly as if a bar of steel had snapped to behind him, that their vigilance was renewed.
And from those evil heads there came a high shrill cry that echoed in the towering walls before him.
Far up above, like an answering signal, a harsh bell clanged a single stroke.
 'That's done it!' said Sam. `Now I've rung the front-door bell! Well, come on somebody!' he
cried. `Tell Captain Shagrat that the great Elf-warrior has called, with his elf-sword too!'
 There was no answer. Sam strode forward. Sting glittered blue in his hand. The courtyard lay in
deep shadow, but he could see that the pavement was strewn with bodies. Right at his feet were two
orc-archers with knives sticking in their backs. Beyond lay many more shapes; some singly as they
had been hewn down or shot; others in pairs, still grappling one another, dead in the very throes of
stabbing, throttling, biting. The stones were slippery with dark blood.
 Two liveries Sam noticed, one marked by the Red Eye, the other by a Moon disfigured with a
ghastly face of death; but he did not stop to look more closely. Across the court a great door at the
foot of the Tower stood half open, and a red light came through; a large orc lay dead upon the
threshold. Sam sprang over the body and went in; and then he peered about at a loss.
 A wide and echoing passage led back from the door towards the mountain-side. It was dimly lit
with torches flaring in brackets on the walls, but its distant end was lost in gloom. Many doors and
openings could be seen on this side and that; but it was empty save for two or three more bodies
sprawling on the floor. From what he had heard of the captains' talk Sam knew that, dead or alive,
Frodo would most likely be found in a chamber high up in the turret far above; but he might search
for a day before he found the way.
 'It'll be near the back, I guess,' Sam muttered. `The whole Tower climbs backwards-like. And
anyway I'd better follow these lights.'
 He advanced down the passage, but slowly now, each step more reluctant. Terror was beginning
to grip him again. There was no sound save the rap of his feet, which seemed to grow to an echoing
noise, like the slapping of great hands upon the stones. The dead bodies: the emptiness; the dank
black walls that in the torchlight seemed to drip with blood; the fear of sudden death lurking in
doorway or shadow; and behind all his mind the waiting watchful malice at the gate: it was almost
more than he could screw himself to face. He would have welcomed a fight-with not too many
enemies at a time – rather than this hideous brooding uncertainty. He forced himself to think of
Frodo, lying bound or in pain or dead somewhere in this dreadful place. He went on.
 He had passed beyond the torchlight, almost to a great arched door at the end of the passage, the
inner side of the under gate, as he rightly guessed, when there came from high above a dreadful
choking shriek. He stopped short. Then he heard feet coming. Someone was running in great haste
down an echoing stairway overhead.
 His will was too weak and slow to restrain his hand. It dragged at the chain and clutched the
Ring. But Sam did not put it on; for even as he clasped it to his breast, an orc came clattering down.
Leaping out of a dark opening at the right, it ran towards him. It was no more than six paces from
him when, lifting its head, it saw him; and Sam could hear its gasping breath and see the glare in its
bloodshot eyes. It stopped short aghast. For what it saw was not a small frightened hobbit trying to
hold a steady sword: it saw a great silent shape, cloaked in a grey shadow, looming against the
wavering light behind; in one hand it held a sword, the very light of which was a bitter pain, the
other was clutched at its breast, but held concealed some nameless menace of power and doom.
 For a moment the orc crouched, and then with a hideous yelp of fear it turned and fled back as it
had come. Never was any dog more heartened when its enemy turned tail than Sam at this
unexpected flight. With a shout he gave chase.
 `Yes! The Elf-warrior is loose!' he cried. 'I'm coming. Just you show me the way up, or I'll skin
you!'
 But the orc was in its own haunts, nimble and well-fed. Sam was a stranger, hungry and weary.
The stairs were high and steep and winding. Sam's breath began to come in gasps. The orc had soon
passed out of sight, and now only faintly could be heard the slapping of its feet as it went on and up.
Every now and again it gave a yell, and the echo ran along the walls. But slowly all sound of it died
away.
 Sam plodded on. He felt that he was on the right road, and his spirits had risen a good deal. He
thrust the Ring away and tightened his belt. `Well, well!' he said. `If only they all take such a
dislike to me and my Sting, this may turn out better than I hoped. And anyway it looks as if Shagrat,
Gorbag, and company have done nearly all my job for me. Except for that little frightened rat, I do
believe there's nobody left alive in the place!'
 And with that he stopped, brought up hard, as if he had hit his head against the stone wall. The
full meaning of what he had said struck him like a blow. Nobody left alive! Whose had been that
horrible dying shriek? `Frodo, Frodo! Master!' he cried half sobbing. 'If they've killed you, what
shall I do? Well, I'm coming at last, right to the top, to see what I must.'
 Up, up he went. It was dark save for an occasional torch flaring at a turn, or beside some
opening that led into the higher levels of the Tower. Sam tried to count the steps, but after two
hundred he lost his reckoning. He was moving quietly now: for he thought that he could hear the
sound of voices talking, still some way above. More than one rat remained alive, it seemed.
 All at once, when he felt that he could pump out no more breath, nor force his knees to bend
again, the stair ended. He stood still. The voices were now loud and near. Sam peered about. He
had climbed right to the flat roof of the third and highest tier of the Tower: an open space, about
twenty yards across, with a low parapet. There the stair was covered by a small domed chamber in
the midst of the roof, with low doors facing east and west. Eastward Sam could see the plain of
Mordor vast and dark below, and the burning mountain far away. A fresh turmoil was surging in its
deep wells, and the rivers of fire blazed so fiercely that even at this distance of many miles the light
of them lit the tower-top with a red glare. Westward the view was blocked by the base of the great
turret that stood at the back of this upper court and reared its horn high above the crest of the
encircling hills. Light gleamed in a window-slit. Its door was not ten yards from where Sam stood.
It was open but dark, and from just within its shadow the voices came.
 At first Sam did not listen; he took a pace out of the eastward door and looked about. At once he
saw that up here the fighting had been fiercest. All the court was choked with dead orcs or their
severed and scattered heads and limbs. The place stank of death. A snarl followed by a blow and a
cry sent him darting back into hiding. An orc-voice rose in anger, and he knew it again at once,
harsh, brutal, cold. It was Shagrat speaking, Captain of the Tower.
 `You won't go again, you say? Curse you, Snaga, you little maggot! If you think I'm so damaged
that it's safe to flout me, you're mistaken Come here, and I'll squeeze your eyes out, like I did to
Radbug just now. And when some new lads come, I'll deal with you: I'll send you to Shelob.'
 `They won't come, not before you're dead anyway,' answered Snaga surlily. 'I've told you twice
that Gorbag's swine got to the gate first, and none of ours got out. Lagduf and Muzgash ran through,
but they were shot. I saw it from a window, I tell you. And they were the last.'
 'Then you must go. I must stay here anyway. But I'm hurt. The Black Pits take that filthy rebel
Gorbag!' Shagrat's voice trailed off into a string of foul names and curses. `I gave him better than I
got, but he knifed me, the dung, before I throttled him. You must go, or I'll eat you. News must get
through to Lugbúrz, or we'll both be for the Black Pits. Yes, you too. You won't escape by skulking
here.'
 `I'm not going down those stairs again,' growled Snaga, `be you captain or no. Nar! Keep your
hands off your knife, or I'll put an arrow in your guts. You won't be a captain long when They hear
about all these goings-on. I've fought for the Tower against those stinking Morgul-rats, but a nice
mess you two precious captains have made of things, fighting over the swag.'
 'That's enough from you,' snarled Shagrat. `I had my orders. It was Gorbag started it, trying to
pinch that pretty shirt.'
 `Well, you put his back up, being so high and mighty. And he had more sense than you anyway.
He told you more than once that the most dangerous of these spies was still loose, and you wouldn't
listen. And you won't listen now. Gorbag was right, I tell you. There's a great fighter about, one of
those bloody-handed Elves, or one of the filthy _tarks_.*1 He's coming here, I tell you. You heard
the bell. He's got past the Watchers, and that's _tark's_ work. He's on the stairs. And until he's off
them, I'm not going down. Not if you were a Nazgûl, I wouldn't.'
 `So that's it, is it?' yelled Shagrat. 'You'll do this, and you'll not do that? And when he does come,
you'll bolt and leave me? No, you won't! I'll put red maggot-holes in your belly first.'
 Out of the turret-door the smaller orc came flying. Behind him came Shagrat, a large orc with
long arms that, as he ran crouching, reached to the ground. But one arm hung limp and seemed to
be bleeding; the other hugged a large black bundle. In the red glare Sam, cowering behind the stairdoor,
caught a glimpse of his evil face as it passed: it was scored as if by rending claws and
smeared with blood; slaver dripped from its protruding fangs; the mouth snarled like an animal.
 As far as Sam could see, Shagrat hunted Snaga round the roof, until ducking and eluding him
the smaller orc with a yelp darted back into the turret and disappeared. Then Shagrat halted. Out of
the eastward door Sam could see him now by the parapet, panting, his left claw clenching and
unclenching feebly. He put the bundle on the floor and with his right claw drew out a long red knife
and spat on it. Going to the parapet he leaned over, looking down into the outer court far below.
Twice he shouted but no answer came.
 Suddenly, as Shagrat was stooped over the battlement, his back to the roof-top, Sam to his
amazement saw that one of the sprawling bodies was moving. It was crawling. It put out a claw and
clutched the bundle. It staggered up. In its other hand it held a broad-headed spear with a short
broken haft. It was poised for a stabbing thrust. But at that very moment a hiss escaped its teeth, a
gasp of pain or hate. Quick as a snake Shagrat slipped aside, twisted round, and drove his knife into
his enemy's throat.
 `Got you, Gorbag!' he cried. 'Not quite dead, eh? Well, I'll finish my job now.' He sprang on to
the fallen body, and stamped and trampled it in his fury, stooping now and again to stab and slash it
with his knife. Satisfied at last, he threw back his head and let out a horrible gurgling yell of
triumph. Then he licked his knife, and put it between his teeth, and catching up the bundle he came
loping towards the near door of the stairs.
 Sam had no time to think. He might have slipped out of the other door, but hardly without being
seen; and he could not have played hide-and-seek with this hideous orc for long. He did what was
probably the best thing he could have done. He sprang out to meet Shagrat with a shout. He was no
longer holding the Ring, but it was there, a hidden power, a cowing menace to the slaves of Mordor;
and in his hand was Sting, and its light smote the eyes of the orc like the glitter of cruel stars in the
terrible elf-countries, the dream of which was a cold fear to all his kind. And Shagrat could not both
fight and keep hold of his treasure. He stopped, growling, baring his fangs. Then once more, orcfashion,
he leapt aside, and as Sam sprang at him, using the heavy bundle as both shield and
weapon, he thrust it hard into his enemy's face. Sam staggered, and before he could recover,
Shagrat darted past and down the stairs.
 Sam ran after him, cursing, but he did not go far. Soon the thought of Frodo returned to him, and
he remembered that the other orc had gone back into the turret. Here was another dreadful choice,
and he had no time to ponder it. If Shagrat got away, he would soon get help and come back. But if
Sam pursued him, the other orc might do some horrible deed up there. And anyway Sam might
miss Shagrat or be killed by him. He turned quickly and ran back up the stairs. `Wrong again, I
expect,' he sighed. `But it's my job to go right up to the top first, whatever happens afterwards.'
 Away below Shagrat went leaping down the stairs and out over the court and through the gate,
bearing his precious burden. If Sam could have seen him and known the grief that his escape would
bring, he might have quailed. But now his mind was set on the last stage of his search. He came
cautiously to the turret-door and stepped inside. It opened into darkness. But soon his staring eyes
were aware of a dim light at his right hand. It came from an opening that led to another stairway,
dark and narrow: it appeared to go winding up the turret along the inside of its round outer wall. A
torch was glimmering from somewhere up above.
 Softly Sam began to climb. He came to the guttering torch, fixed above a door on his left that
faced a window-slit looking out westward: one of the red eyes that he and Frodo had seen from
down below by the tunnel's mouth. Quickly Sam passed the door and hurried on to the second
storey, dreading at any moment to he attacked and to feel throttling fingers seize his throat from
behind. He came next to a window looking east and another torch above the door to a passage
through the middle of the turret. The door was open, the passage dark save for the glimmer of the
torch and the red glare from outside filtering through the window-slit. But here the stair stopped
and climbed no further. Sam crept into the passage. On either side there was a low door; both were
closed and locked. There was no sound at all.
 `A dead end,' muttered Sam; `and after all my climb! This can't be the top of the tower. But what
can I do now?'
 He ran back to the lower storey and tried the door. It would not move. He ran up again, and
sweat began to trickle down his face. He felt that even minutes were precious, but one by one they
escaped; and he could do nothing. He cared no longer for Shagrat or Snaga or any other orc that
was ever spawned. He longed only for his master, for one sight of his face or one touch of his hand.
 At last, weary and feeling finally defeated, he sat on a step below the level of the passage-floor
and bowed his head into his hands. It was quiet, horribly quiet. The torch, that was already burning
low when he arrived, sputtered and went out; and he felt the darkness cover him like a tide. And
then softly, to his own surprise, there at the vain end of his long journey and his grief, moved by
what thought in his heart he could not tell, Sam began to sing.
 His voice sounded thin and quavering in the cold dark tower: the voice of a forlorn and weary
hobbit that no listening orc could possibly mistake for the clear song of an Elven-lord. He
murmured old childish tunes out of the Shire, and snatches of Mr. Bilbo's rhymes that came into his
mind like fleeting glimpses of the country of his home. And then suddenly new strength rose in him,
and his voice rang out, while words of his own came unbidden to fit the simple tune.
 _In western lands beneath the Sun
 the flowers may rise in Spring,
 the trees may bud, the waters run,
 the merry finches sing.
 Or there maybe 'tis cloudless night
 and swaying beeches bear
 the Elven-stars as jewels white
 amid their branching hair.
 Though here at journey's end I lie
 in darkness buried deep,
 beyond all towers strong and high,
 beyond all mountains steep,
 above all shadows rides the Sun
 and Stars for ever dwell:
 I will not say the Day is done,
 nor bid the Stars farewell._
 `Beyond all towers strong and high,' he began again, and then he stopped short. He thought that
he had heard a faint voice answering him. But now he could hear nothing. Yes, he could hear
something, but not a voice. Footsteps were approaching. Now a door was being opened quietly in
the passage above; the hinges creaked. Sam crouched down listening. The door closed with a dull
thud; and then a snarling orc-voice rang out.
 'Ho la! You up there, you dunghill rat! Stop your squeaking, or I'll come and deal with you.
D'you hear?'
 There was no answer.
 'All right,' growled Snaga. `But I'll come and have a look at you all the same, and see what
you're up to.'
 The hinges creaked again, and Sam, now peering over the corner of the passage-threshold, saw a
flicker of light in an open doorway, and the dim shape of an orc coming out. He seemed to be
carrying a ladder. Suddenly the answer dawned on Sam: the topmost chamber was reached by a
trap-door in the roof of the passage. Snaga thrust the ladder upwards, steadied it, and then
clambered out of sight. Sam heard a bolt drawn back. Then he heard the hideous voice speaking
again.
 `You lie quiet, or you'll pay for it! You've not got long to live in peace, I guess; but if you don't
want the fun to begin right now, keep your trap shut, see? There's a reminder for you!' There was a
sound like the crack of a whip.
 At that rage blazed in Sam's heart to a sudden fury. He sprang up, ran, and went up the ladder
like a cat. His head came out in the middle of the floor of a large round chamber. A red lamp hung
from its roof; the westward window-slit was high and dark. Something was lying on the floor by
the wall under the window, but over it a black orc-shape was straddled. It raised a whip a second
time, but the blow never fell.
 With a cry Sam leapt across the floor, Sting in hand. The orc wheeled round, but before it could
make a move Sam slashed its whip-hand from its arm. Howling with pain and fear but desperate the
orc charged head-down at him. Sam's next blow went wide, and thrown off his balance he fell
backwards, clutching at the orc as it stumbled over him. Before he could scramble up he heard a cry
and a thud. The orc in its wild haste had tripped on the ladder-head and fallen through the open
trap-door. Sam gave no more thought to it. He ran to the figure huddled on the floor. It was Frodo.
 He was naked, lying as if in a swoon on a heap of filthy rags: his arm was flung up, shielding his
head, and across his side there ran an ugly whip-weal.
 `Frodo! Mr. Frodo, my dear!' cried Sam, tears almost blinding him. `It's Sam, I've come!' He
half lifted his master and hugged him to his breast. Frodo opened his eyes.
 `Am I still dreaming?' he muttered. `But the other dreams were horrible.'
 `You're not dreaming at all, Master,' said Sam. `It's real. It's me. I've come.'
 `I can hardly believe it,' said Frodo, clutching him. `There was an orc with a whip, and then it
turns into Sam! Then I wasn't dreaming after all when I heard that singing down below, and I tried
to answer? Was it you?'
 'It was indeed, Mr. Frodo. I'd given up hope, almost. I couldn't find you.
 Well, you have now, Sam, dear Sam, said Frodo, and he la back in Sam's gentle arms, closing
his eyes, like a child at rest when night-fears are driven away by some loved voice or hand.
 Sam felt that he could sit like that in endless happiness; but it was not allowed. It was not
enough for him to find his master, he had still to try and save him. He kissed Frodo's forehead.
`Come! Wake up Mr. Frodo!' he said, trying to sound as cheerful as he had when he drew back the
curtains at Bag End on a summer's morning.
 Frodo sighed and sat up. `Where are we? How did I get here?' he asked.
 'There's no time for tales till we get somewhere else, Mr. Frodo,' said Sam. `But you're in the top
of that tower you and me saw from away down by the tunnel before the orcs got you. How long ago
that was I don't know. More than a day, I guess.'
 `Only that?' said Frodo. `It seems weeks. You must tell me all about it, if we get a chance.
Something hit me, didn't it? And I fell into darkness and foul dreams, and woke and found that
waking was worse. Orcs were all round me. I think they had just been pouring some horrible
burning drink down my throat. My head grew clear, but I was aching and weary. They stripped me
of everything; and then two great brutes came and questioned me, questioned me until I thought I
should go mad, standing over me, gloating, fingering their knives. I'll never forget their claws and
eyes.'
 `You won't, if you talk about them, Mr. Frodo,' said Sam. 'And if we don't want to see them
again, the sooner we get going the better. Can you walk?'
 `Yes, I can walk,' said Frodo, getting up slowly. 'I am not hurt Sam. Only I feel very tired, and
I've a pain here.' He put his hand to the back of his neck above his left shoulder. He stood up, and it
looked to Sam as if he was clothed in flame: his naked skin was scarlet in the light of the lamp
above. Twice he paced across the floor.
 `That's better!' he said, his spirits rising a little. `I didn't dare to move when I was left alone, or
one of the guards came. Until the yelling and fighting began. The two big brutes: they quarrelled, I
think. Over me and my things. I lay here terrified. And then all went deadly quiet, and that was
worse.'
 `Yes, they quarrelled, seemingly,' said Sam. There must have been a couple of hundred of the
dirty creatures in this place. A bit of a tall order for Sam Gamgee, as you might say. But they've
done all the killing of themselves. That's lucky, but it's too long to make a song about, till we're out
of here. Now what's to be done? You can't go walking in the Black Land in naught but your skin,
Mr. Frodo.'
 `They've taken everything, Sam,' said Frodo. `Everything I had. Do you understand?
_Everything!_' He cowered on the floor again with bowed head, as his own words brought home to
him the fullness of the disaster, and despair overwhelmed him. 'The quest has failed Sam. Even if
we get out of here, we can't escape. Only Elves can escape. Away, away out of Middle-earth, far
away over the Sea. If even that is wide enough to keep the Shadow out.'
 `No, _not_ everything, Mr. Frodo. And it hasn't failed, not yet. I took it, Mr. Frodo, begging
your pardon. And I've kept it safe. It's round my neck now, and a terrible burden it is, too.' Sam
fumbled for the Ring and its chain. `But I suppose you must take it back.' Now it had come to it,
Sam felt reluctant to give up the Ring and burden his master with it again.
 `You've got it?' gasped Frodo. `You've got it here? Sam, you're a marvel!' Then quickly and
strangely his tone changed. `Give it to me!' he cried, standing up, holding out a trembling hand.
`Give it me at once! You can't have it!'
 'All right, Mr. Frodo,' said Sam, rather startled. 'Here it is!' Slowly he drew the Ring out and
passed the chain over his head. `But you're in the land of Mordor now, sir; and when you get out,
you'll see the Fiery Mountain and all. You'll find the Ring very dangerous now, and very hard to
bear. If it's too hard a job, I could share it with you, maybe?'
 `No, no!' cried Frodo, snatching the Ring and chain from Sam's hands. `No you won't, you
thief!' He panted, staring at Sam with eyes wide with fear and enmity. Then suddenly, clasping the
Ring in one clenched fist, he stood aghast. A mist seemed to clear from his eyes, and he passed a
hand over his aching brow. The hideous vision had seemed so real to him, half bemused as he was
still with wound and fear. Sam had changed before his very eyes into an orc again, leering and
pawing at his treasure, a foul little creature with greedy eyes and slobbering mouth. But now the
vision had passed. There was Sam kneeling before him, his face wrung with pain, as if he had been
stabbed in the heart; tears welled from his eyes.
 'O Sam!' cried Frodo. `What have I said? What have I done? Forgive me! After all you have
done. It is the horrible power of the Ring. I wish it had never, never, been found. But don't mind me,
Sam. I must carry the burden to the end. It can't be altered. You can't come between me and this
doom.'
 'That's all right, Mr. Frodo,' said Sam, rubbing his sleeve across his eyes. `I understand. But I
can still help, can't I? I've got to get you out of here. At once, see! But first you want some clothes
and gear and then some food. The clothes will be the easiest part. As we're in Mordor, we'd, best
dress up Mordor-fashion; and anyway there isn't no choice. It'll have to be orc-stuff for you, Mr.
Frodo, I'm afraid. And for me too. If we go together, we'd best match. Now put this round you!'
 Sam unclasped his grey cloak and cast it about Frodo's shoulders. Then unslinging his pack he
laid it on the floor. He drew Sting from its sheath. Hardly a flicker was to be seen upon its blade. `I
was forgetting this, Mr. Frodo,' he said. `No, they didn't get everything! You lent me Sting, if you
remember, and the Lady's glass. I've got them both still. But lend them to me a little longer, Mr.
Frodo. I must go and see what I can find. You stay here. Walk about a bit and ease your legs. I
shan't be long. I shan't have to go far.'
 `Take care, Sam!' said Frodo. `And be quick! There may be orcs still alive, lurking in wait.'
 'I've got to chance it,' said Sam. He stepped to the trap-door and slipped down the ladder. In a
minute his head reappeared. He threw a long knife on the floor.
 `There's something that might be useful,' he said. 'He's dead: the one that whipped you. Broke
his neck, it seems, in his hurry. Now you draw up the ladder, if you can, Mr. Frodo; and don't you
let it down till you hear me call the password. _Elbereth_ I'll call. What the Elves say. No orc
would say that.'
 Frodo sat for a while and shivered, dreadful fears chasing one another through his mind. Then
he got up, drew the grey elven-cloak about him, and to keep his mind occupied, began to walk to
and fro, prying and peering into every corner of his prison.
 It was not very long, though fear made it seem an hour at least, before he heard Sam's voice
calling softly from below: _Elbereth, Elbereth_. Frodo let down the light ladder. Up came Sam,
puffing, heaving a great bundle on his head. He let it fall with a thud.
 `Quick now. Mr. Frodo!' he said. `I've had a bit of a search to find anything small enough for the
likes of us. We'll have to make do. But we must hurry. I've met nothing alive, and I've seen nothing
but I'm not easy. I think this place is being watched. I can't explain it, but well: it feels to me as if
one of those foul flying Riders was about, up in the blackness where he can't be seen.'
 He opened the bundle. Frodo looked in disgust at the contents, but there was nothing for it: he
had to put the things on, or go naked. There were long hairy breeches of some unclean beast-fell,
and a tunic of dirty leather. He drew them on. Over the tunic went a coat of stout ring-mail, short
for a full-sized orc, too long for Frodo and heavy. About it he clasped a belt, at which there hung a
short sheath holding a broad-bladed stabbing-sword. Sam had brought several orc-helmets. One of
them fitted Frodo well enough, a black cap with iron rim, and iron hoops covered with leather upon
which the evil Eye was painted in red above the beaklike nose-guard.
 `The Morgul-stuff, Gorbag's gear, was a better fit and better made,' said Sam; `but it wouldn't do,
I guess, to go carrying his tokens into Mordor, not after this business here. Well, there you are, Mr.
Frodo. A perfect little orc, if I may make so bold-at least you would be, if we could cover your face
with a mask, give you longer arms, and make you bow-legged. This will hide some of the tell-tales.'
He put a large black cloak round Frodo's shoulders. `Now you're ready! You can pick up a shield as
we go.'
 'What about you, Sam?' said Frodo. `Aren't we going to match?'
 `Well, Mr. Frodo, I've been thinking,' said Sam. 'I'd best not leave any of my stuff behind, and
we can't destroy it. And I can't wear orc-mail over all my clothes, can I? I'll just have to cover up.'
 He knelt down and carefully folded his elven-cloak. It went into a surprisingly small roll. This
he put into his pack that lay on the floor. Standing up, he slung it behind his back, put an orc-helm
on his head, and cast another black cloak about his shoulders. `There!' he said. `Now we match,
near enough. And now we must be off!'
 'I can't go all the way at a run, Sam,' said Frodo with a wry smile. 'I hope you've made inquiries
about inns along the road? Or have you forgotten about food and drink?'
 `Save me, but so I had!' said Sam. He whistled in dismay. 'Bless me, Mr. Frodo, but you've gone
and made me that hungry and thirsty! I don't know when drop or morsel last passed my lips. I'd
forgotten it, trying to find you. But let me think! Last time I looked I'd got about enough of that
waybread, and of what Captain Faramir gave us, to keep me on my legs for a couple of weeks at a
pinch. But if there's a drop left in my bottle, there's no more. That's not going to be enough for two,
nohow. Don't ores eat, and don't they drink? Or do they just live on foul air and poison?'
 `No, they eat and drink, Sam. The Shadow that bred them can only mock, it cannot make: not
real new things of its own. I don't think it gave life to the ores, it only ruined them and twisted them;
and if they are to live at all, they have to live like other living creatures. Foul waters and foul meats
they'll take, if they can get no better, but not poison. They've fed me, and so I'm better off than you.
There must be food and water somewhere in this place.' `But there's no time to look for them,' said
Sam.
 `Well, things are a bit better than you think,' said Frodo. 'I have had a bit of luck while you were
away. Indeed they did not take everything. I've found my food-bag among some rags on the floor.
They've rummaged it, of course. But I guess they disliked the very look and smell of the _lembas_,
worse than Gollum did. It's scattered about and some of it is trampled and broken, but I've gathered
it together. It's not far short of what you've got. But they've taken Faramir's food, and they've
slashed up my water-bottle.'
 `Well, there's no more to be said,' said Sam. `We've got enough to start on. But the water's going
to be a bad business. But come Mr. Frodo! Off we go, or a whole lake of it won't do us any good!'
 'Not till you've had a mouthful, Sam,' said Frodo. `I won't budge. Here, take this elven-cake, and
drink that last drop in your bottle! The whole thing is quite hopeless, so it's no good worrying about
tomorrow. It probably won't come.'
 At last they started. Down the ladder they climbed, and then Sam took it and laid it in the
passage beside the huddled body of the fallen orc. The stair was dark, but on the roof-top the glare
of the Mountain could still be seen, though it was dying down now to a sullen red. They picked up
two shields to complete their disguise and then went on.
 Down the great stairway they plodded. The high chamber of the turret behind, where they had
met again, seemed almost homely: they were out in the open again now, and terror ran along the
walls. All might be dead in the Tower of Cirith Ungol, but it was steeped in fear and evil still.
 At length they came to the door upon the outer court, and they halted. Even from where they
stood they felt the malice of the Watchers beating on them, black silent shapes on either side of the
gate through which the glare of Mordor dimly showed. As they threaded their way among the
hideous bodies of the ores each step became more difficult. Before they even reached the archway
they were brought to a stand. To move an inch further was a pain and weariness to will and limb.
 Frodo had no strength for such a battle. He sank to the ground. `I can't go on, Sam,' he
murmured. `I'm going to faint. I don't know what's come over me.'
 `I do, Mr. Frodo. Hold up now! It's the gate. There's some devilry there. But I got through, and
I'm going to get out. It can't be more dangerous than before. Now for it!'
 Sam drew out the elven-glass of Galadriel again. As if to do honour to his hardihood, and to
grace with splendour his faithful brown hobbit-hand that had done such deeds, the phial blazed
forth suddenly, so that all the shadowy court was lit with a dazzling radiance like lightning; but it
remained steady and did not pass.
 '_Gilthoniel, A Elbereth!_' Sam cried. For, why he did not know, his thought sprang back
suddenly to the Elves in the Shire, and the song that drove away the Black Rider in the trees.
 '_Aiya elenion ancalima!_' cried Frodo once again behind him.
 The will of the Watchers was broken with a suddenness like the snapping of a cord, and Frodo
and Sam stumbled forward. Then they ran. Through the gate and past the great seated figures with
their glittering eyes. There was a crack. The keystone of the arch crashed almost on their heels, and
the wall above crumbled, and fell in ruin. Only by a hair did they escape. A bell clanged; and from
the Watchers there went up a high and dreadful wail. Far up above in the darkness it was answered.
Out of the black sky there came dropping like a bolt a winged shape, rending the clouds with a
ghastly shriek.
 _Chapter 2_
 The Land of Shadow
 Sam had just wits enough left to thrust the phial back into his breast. 'Run, Mr. Frodo!' he cried.
'No, not that way! There's a sheer drop over the wall. Follow me!'
 Down the road from the gate they fled. In fifty paces, with a swift bend round a jutting bastion
of the cliff, it took them out of sight from the Tower. They had escaped for the moment. Cowering
back against the rock they drew breath, and then they clutched at their hearts. Perching now on the
wall beside the ruined gate the Nazgûl sent out its deadly cries. All the cliffs echoed.
 In terror they stumbled on. Soon the road bent sharply eastward again and exposed them for a
dreadful moment to view from the Tower. As they flitted across they glanced back and saw the
great black shape upon the battlement; then they plunged down between high rock-walls in a
cutting that fell steeply to join the Morgul-road. They came to the way-meeting. There was still no
sign of orcs, nor of an answer to the cry of the Nazgûl; but they knew that the silence would not last
long. At any moment now the hunt would begin.
 'This won't do, Sam,' said Frodo. 'If we were real orcs, we ought to be dashing back to the Tower,
not running away. The first enemy we meet will know us. We must get off this road somehow.'
 'But we can't,' said Sam, 'not without wings.'
 The eastern faces of the Ephel Dúath were sheer, falling in cliff and precipice to the black
trough that lay between them and the inner ridge. A short way beyond the way-meeting, after
another steep incline, a flying bridge of stone leapt over the chasm and bore the road across into the
tumbled slopes and glens of the Morgai. With a desperate spurt Frodo and Sam dashed along the
bridge; but they had hardly reached its further end when they heard the hue and cry begin. Away
behind them, now high above on the mountain-side, loomed the Tower of Cirith Ungol, its stones
glowing dully. Suddenly its harsh bell clanged again, and then broke into a shattering peal. Horns
sounded. And now from beyond the bridge-end came answering cries. Down in the dark trough, cut
off from the dying glare of Orodruin, Frodo and Sam could not see ahead, but already they heard
the tramp of iron-shod feet, and upon the road there rang the swift clatter of hoofs.
 'Quick, Sam! Over we go!' cried Frodo. They scrambled on to the low parapet of the bridge.
Fortunately there was no longer any dreadful drop into the gulf, for the slopes of the Morgai had
already risen almost to the level of the road; but it was too dark for them to guess the depth of the
fall.
 'Well, here goes, Mr. Frodo,' said Sam. 'Good-bye!'
 He let go. Frodo followed. And even as they fell they heard the rush of horsemen sweeping over
the bridge and the rattle of orc-feet running up behind. But Sam would have laughed, if he had
dared. Half fearing a breaking plunge down on to unseen rocks the hobbits landed, in a drop of no
more than a dozen feet, with a thud and a crunch into the last thing that they had expected: a tangle
of thorny bushes. There Sam lay still, softly sucking a scratched hand.
 When the sound of hoof and foot had passed he ventured a whisper. 'Bless me, Mr. Frodo, but I
didn't know as anything grew in Mordor! But if I had a'known, this is just what I'd have looked for.
These thorns must be a foot long by the feel of them; they've stuck through everything I've got on.
Wish I'd a'put that mail-shirt on!'
 'Orc-mail doesn't keep these thorns out,' said Frodo. 'Not even a leather jerkin is any good.'
 They had a struggle to get out of the thicket. The thorns and briars were as tough as wire and as
clinging as claws. Their cloaks were rent and tattered before they broke free at last.
 'Now down we go, Sam,' Frodo whispered. 'Down into the valley quick, and then turn northward,
as soon as ever we can.'
 Day was coming again in the world outside, and far beyond the glooms of Mordor the Sun was
climbing over the eastern rim of Middle-earth; but here all was still dark as night. The Mountain
smouldered and its fires went out. The glare faded from the cliffs. The easterly wind that had been
blowing ever since they left Ithilien now seemed dead. Slowly and painfully they clambered down,
groping, stumbling, scrambling among rock and briar and dead wood in the blind shadows, down
and down until they could go no further.
 At length they stopped, and sat side by side, their backs against a boulder. Both were sweating.
'If Shagrat himself was to offer me a glass of water, I'd shake his hand,' said Sam.
 'Don't say such things!' said Frodo. 'It only makes it worse.' Then he stretched himself out, dizzy
and weary, and he spoke no more for a while. At last with a struggle he got up again. To his
amazement he found that Sam was asleep. 'Wake up, Sam!' he said. 'Come on! It's time we made
another effort.'
 Sam scrambled to his feet. 'Well I never!' he said. 'I must have dropped off. It's a long time, Mr.
Frodo, since I had a proper sleep, and my eyes just closed down on their own.'
 Frodo now led the way, northward as near as he could guess, among the stones and boulders
lying thick at the bottom of the great ravine. But presently he stopped again.
 'It's no good, Sam,' he said. 'I can't manage it. This mail-shirt, I mean. Not in my present state.
Even my mithril-coat seemed heavy when I was tired. This is far heavier. And what's the use of it?
We shan't win through by fighting.'
 'But we may have some to do,' said Sam. 'And there's knives and stray arrows. That Gollum isn't
dead, for one thing. I don't like to think of you with naught but a bit of leather between you and a
stab in the dark.'
 'Look here, Sam dear lad,' said Frodo: 'I am tired, weary, I haven't a hope left. But I have to go
on trying to get to the Mountain, as long as I can move. The Ring is enough. This extra weight is
killing me. It must go. But don't think I'm ungrateful. I hate to think of the foul work you must have
had among the bodies to find it for me.'
 'Don't talk about it, Mr. Frodo. Bless you! I'd carry you on my back, if I could. Let it go then!'
 Frodo laid aside his cloak and took off the orc-mail and flung it away. He shivered a little. 'What
I really need is something warm,' he said. 'It's gone cold, or else I've caught a chill.'
 'You can have my cloak, Mr. Frodo,' said Sam. He unslung his pack and took out the elvencloak. 'How's
this, Mr. Frodo?' he said. 'You wrap that orc-rag close round you, and put the belt
outside it. Then this can go over all. It don't look quite orc-fashion, but it'll keep you warmer; and I
daresay it'll keep you from harm better than any other gear. It was made by the Lady.'
 Frodo took the cloak and fastened the brooch. 'That's better!' he said. 'I feel much lighter. I can
go on now. But this blind dark seems to be getting into my heart. As I lay in prison, Sam. I tried to
remember the Brandywine, and Woody End, and The Water running through the mill at Hobbiton.
But I can't see them now.'
 'There now, Mr. Frodo, it's you that's talking of water this time!' said Sam. 'If only the Lady
could see us or hear us, I'd say to her: Your Ladyship, all we want is light and water: just clean
water and plain daylight, better than any jewels, begging your pardon. But it's a long way to
Lórien.' Sam sighed and waved his hand towards the heights of the Ephel Dúath, now only to be
guessed as a deeper blackness against the black sky.
 They started off again. They had not gone far when Frodo paused. 'There's a Black Rider over
us,' he said. 'I can feel it. We had better keep still for a while.'
 Crouched under a great boulder they sat facing back westward and did not speak for some time.
Then Frodo breathed a sigh of relief. 'It's passed,' he said. They stood up, and then they both stared
in wonder. Away to their left, southward, against a sky that was turning grey, the peaks and high
ridges of the great range began to appear dark and black, visible shapes. Light was growing behind
them. Slowly it crept towards the North. There was battle far above in the high spaces of the air.
The billowing clouds of Mordor were being driven back, their edges tattering as a wind out of the
living world came up and swept the fumes and smokes towards the dark land of their home. Under
the lifting skirts of the dreary canopy dim light leaked into Mordor like pale morning through the
grimed window of a prison.
 'Look at it, Mr. Frodo!' said Sam. 'Look at it! The wind's changed. Something's happening. He's
not having it all his own way. His darkness is breaking up out in the world there. I wish I could see
what is going on!'
 It was the morning of the fifteenth of March, and over the Vale of Anduin the Sun was rising
above the eastern shadow, and the south-west wind was blowing. Théoden lay dying on the
Pelennor Fields.
 As Frodo and Sam stood and gazed, the rim of light spread all along the line of the Ephel Dúath,
and then they saw a shape, moving at a great speed out of the West, at first only a black speck
against the glimmering strip above the mountain-tops, but growing, until it plunged like a bolt into
the dark canopy and passed high above them. As it went it sent out a long shrill cry, the voice of a
Nazgûl; but this cry no longer held any terror for them: it was a cry of woe and dismay, ill tidings
for the Dark Tower. The Lord of the Ring-wraiths had met his doom.
 'What did I tell you? Something's happening!' cried Sam.' The war's going well, said Shagrat;
but Gorbag he wasn't so sure. And he was right there too. Things are looking up, Mr. Frodo.
Haven't you got some hope now?'
 'Well no, not much, Sam,' Frodo sighed. 'That's away beyond the mountains. We're going east
not west. And I'm so tired. And the Ring is so heavy, Sam. And I begin to see it in my mind all the
time, like a great wheel of fire.'
 Sam's quick spirits sank again at once. He looked at his master anxiously, and he took his hand.
'Come, Mr. Frodo!' he said. 'I've got one thing I wanted: a bit of light. Enough to help us, and yet I
guess it's dangerous too. Try a bit further, and then we'll lie close and have a rest. But take a morsel
to eat now, a bit of the Elves' food; it may hearten you.'
 Sharing a wafer of _lembas_, and munching it as best they could with their parched mouths.
Frodo and Sam plodded on. The light, though no more than a grey dusk, was now enough for them
to see that they were deep in the valley between the mountains. It sloped up gently northward, and
at its bottom went the bed of a now dry and withered stream. Beyond its stony course they saw a
beaten path that wound its way under the feet of the westward cliffs. Had they known, they could
have reached it quicker, for it was a track that left the main Morgul-road at the western bridge-end
and went down by a long stair cut in the rock to the valley's bottom. It was used by patrols or by
messengers going swiftly to lesser posts and strongholds north-away, between Cirith Ungol and the
narrows of Isenmouthe, the iron jaws of Carach Angren.
 It was perilous for the hobbits to use such a path, but they needed speed, and Frodo felt that he
could not face the toil of scrambling among the boulders or in the trackless glens of the Morgai.
And he judged that northward was, maybe, the way that their hunters would least expect them to
take. The road east to the plain, or the pass back westward, those they would first search most
thoroughly. Only when he was well north of the Tower did he mean to turn and seek for some way
to take him east, east on the last desperate stage of his journey. So now they crossed the stony bed
and took to the orc-path, and for some time they marched along it. The cliffs at their left were
overhung, and they could not be seen from above; but the path made many bends, and at each bend
they gripped their sword-hilts and went forward cautiously.
 The light grew no stronger, for Orodruin was still belching forth a great fume that, beaten
upwards by the opposing airs, mounted higher and higher, until it reached a region above the wind
and spread in an immeasurable roof, whose central pillar rose out of the shadows beyond their view.
They had trudged for more than an hour when they heard a sound that brought them to a halt.
Unbelievable, but unmistakable. Water trickling. Out of a gully on the left, so sharp and narrow that
it looked as if the black cliff had been cloven by some huge axe, water came dripping down: the
last remains, maybe, of some sweet rain gathered from sunlit seas, but ill-fated to fall at last upon
the walls of the Black Land and wander fruitless down into the dust. Here it came out of the rock in
a little falling streamlet, and flowed across the path, and turning south ran away swiftly to be lost
among the dead stones.
 Sam sprang towards it. 'If ever I see the Lady again, I will tell her!' he cried. 'Light and now
water!' Then he stopped. 'Let me drink first Mr. Frodo,' he said.
 'All right, but there's room enough for two.'
 'I didn't mean that,' said Sam. 'I mean: if it's poisonous, or something that will show its badness
quick, well, better me than you, master, if you understand me.'
 'I do. But I think we'll trust our luck together, Sam; or our blessing. Still, be careful now, if it's
very cold!'
 The water was cool but not icy, and it had an unpleasant taste, at once bitter and oily, or so they
would have said at home. Here it seemed beyond all praise, and beyond fear or prudence. They
drank their fill, and Sam replenished his water-bottle. After that Frodo felt easier, and they went on
for several miles, until the broadening of the road and the beginnings of a rough wall along its edge
warned them that they were drawing near to another orc-hold.
 'This is where we turn aside, Sam,' said Frodo. 'And we must turn east.' He sighed as he looked
at the gloomy ridges across the valley. 'I have just about enough strength left to find some hole
away up there. And then I must rest a little.'
 The river-bed was now some way below the path. They scrambled down to it, and began to
cross it. To their surprise they came upon dark pools fed by threads of water trickling down from
some source higher up the valley. Upon its outer marges under the westward mountains Mordor
was a dying land, but it was not yet dead. And here things still grew, harsh, twisted, bitter,
struggling for life. In the glens of the Morgai on the other side of the valley low scrubby trees
lurked and clung, coarse grey grass-tussocks fought with the stones, and withered mosses crawled
on them; and everywhere great writhing, tangled brambles sprawled. Some had long stabbing
thorns, some hooked barbs that rent like knives. The sullen shrivelled leaves of a past year hung on
them, grating and rattling in the sad airs, but their maggot-ridden buds were only just opening. Flies,
dun or grey, or black, marked like ores with a red eye-shaped blotch, buzzed and stung; and above
the briar-thickets clouds of hungry midges danced and reeled.
 'Orc-gear's no good,' said Sam, waving his arms. 'I wish I'd got an orc's hide!'
 At last Frodo could go no further. They had climbed up a narrow shelving ravine, but they still
had a long way to go before they could even come in sight of the last craggy ridge. 'I must rest now,
Sam, and sleep if I can.' said Frodo. He looked about, but there seemed nowhere even for an animal
to crawl into in this dismal country. At length, tired out, they slunk under a curtain of brambles that
hung down like a mat over a low rock-face.
 There they sat and made such a meal as they could. Keeping back the precious _lembas_ for the
evil days ahead, they ate the half of what remained in Sam's bag of Faramir's provision: some dried
fruit, and a small slip of cured meat; and they sipped some water. They had drunk again from the
pools in the valley, but they were very, thirsty again. There was a bitter tang in the air of Mordor
that dried the mouth. When Sam thought of water even his hopeful spirit quailed. Beyond the
Morgai there was the dreadful plain of Gorgoroth to cross.
 'Now you go to sleep first, Mr. Frodo,' he said. 'It's getting dark again. I reckon this day is nearly
over.'
 Frodo sighed and was asleep almost before the words were spoken. Sam struggled with his own
weariness, and he took Frodo's hand; and there he sat silent till deep night fell. Then at last, to keep
himself awake, he crawled from the hiding-place and looked out. The land seemed full of creaking
and cracking and sly noises, but there was no sound of voice or of foot. Far above the Ephel Dúath
in the West the night-sky was still dim and pale. There, peeping among the cloud-wrack above a
dark tor high up in the mountains, Sam saw a white star twinkle for a while. The beauty of it smote
his heart, as he looked up out of the forsaken land, and hope returned to him. For like a shaft, clear
and cold, the thought pierced him that in the end the Shadow was only a small and passing thing:
there was light and high beauty for ever beyond its reach. His song in the Tower had been defiance
rather than hope; for then he was thinking of himself. Now, for a moment, his own fate, and even
his masters, ceased to trouble him. He crawled back into the brambles and laid himself by Frodo's
side, and putting away all fear he cast himself into a deep untroubled sleep.
 They woke together, hand in hand. Sam was almost fresh, ready for another day; but Frodo
sighed. His sleep had been uneasy, full of dreams of fire, and waking brought him no comfort. Still
his sleep had not been without all healing virtue: he was stronger, more able to bear his burden one
stage further. They did not know the time, nor how long they had slept; but after a morsel of food
and a sip of water they went on up the ravine, until it ended in a sharp slope of screes and sliding
stones. There the last living things gave up their struggle; the tops of the Morgai were grassless,
bare, jagged, barren as a slate.
 After much wandering and search they found a way that they could climb, and with a last
hundred feet of clawing scramble they were up. They came to a cleft between two dark crags, and
passing through found themselves on the very edge of the last fence of Mordor. Below them, at the
bottom of a fall of some fifteen hundred feet, lay the inner plain stretching away into a formless
gloom beyond their sight. The wind of the world blew now from the West, and the great clouds
were lifted high, floating away eastward; but still only a grey light came to the dreary fields of
Gorgoroth. There smokes trailed on the ground and lurked in hollows, and fumes leaked from
fissures in the earth.
 Still far away, forty miles at least, they saw Mount Doom, its feet founded in ashen ruin, its
huge cone rising to a great height, where its reeking head was swathed in cloud. Its fires were now
dimmed, and it stood in smouldering slumber, as threatening and dangerous as a sleeping beast.
Behind it there hung a vast shadow, ominous as a thunder-cloud, the veils of Barad-dûr that was
reared far way upon a long spur of the Ashen Mountains thrust down from the North. The Dark
Power was deep in thought, and the Eye turned inward, pondering tidings of doubt and danger: a
bright sword, and a stern and kingly face it saw, and for a while it gave little thought to other things;
and all its great stronghold, gate on gate, and tower on tower, was wrapped in a brooding gloom.
 Frodo and Sam gazed out in mingled loathing and wonder on this hateful land. Between them
and the smoking mountain, and about it north and south, all seemed ruinous and dead, a desert
burned and choked. They wondered how the Lord of this realm maintained and fed his slaves and
his armies. Yet armies he had. As far as their eyes could reach, along the skirts of the Morgai and
away southward, there were camps, some of tents, some ordered like small towns. One of the
largest of these was right below them. Barely a mile out into the plain it clustered like some huge
nest of insects, with straight dreary streets of huts and long low drab buildings. About it the ground
was busy with folk going to and fro; a wide road ran from it south-east to join the Morgul-way, and
along it many lines of small black shapes were hurrying.
 'I don't like the look of things at all,' said Sam. 'Pretty hopeless, I call it – saving that where
there's such a lot of folk there must be wells or water, not to mention food. And these are Men not
Orcs, or my eyes are all wrong.'
 Neither he nor Frodo knew anything of the great slave-worked fields away south in this wide
realm, beyond the fumes of the Mountain by the dark sad waters of Lake Núrnen; nor of the great
roads that ran away east and south to tributary lands, from which the soldiers of the Tower brought
long waggon-trains of goods and booty and fresh slaves. Here in the northward regions were the
mines and forges, and the musterings of long-planned war; and here the Dark Power, moving its
armies like pieces on the board, was gathering them together. Its first moves, the first feelers of its
strength, had been checked upon its western line, southward and northward. For the moment it
withdrew them, and brought up new forces, massing them about Cirith Gorgor for an avenging
stroke. And if it had also been its purpose to defend the Mountain against all approach, it could
scarcely have done more.
 'Well!' Sam went on. 'Whatever they have to eat and drink, we can't get it. There's no way down
that I can see. And we couldn't cross all that open country crawling with enemies, even if we did
get down.'
 'Still we shall have to try,' said Frodo. 'It's no worse than I expected. I never hoped to get across.
I can't see any hope of it now. But I've still got to do the best I can. At present that is to avoid being
captured as long as possible. So we must still go northwards, I think, and see what it is like where
the open plain is narrower.'
 'I guess what it'll be like,' said Sam. 'Where it's narrower the Orcs and Men will just be packed
closer. You'll see, Mr. Frodo.'
 'I dare say I shall, if we ever get so far,' said Frodo and turned away.
 They soon found that it was impossible to make their way along the crest of the Morgai, or
anywhere along its higher levels, pathless as they were and scored with deep ghylls. In the end they
were forced to go back down the ravine that they had climbed and seek for a way along the valley.
It was rough going, for they dared not cross over to the path on the westward side. After a mile or
more they saw, huddled in a hollow at the cliff's foot, the orc-hold that they had guessed was near
at hand: a wall and a cluster of stone huts set about the dark mouth of a cave. There was no
movement to be seen, but the hobbits crept by cautiously, keeping as much as they could to the
thorn-brakes that grew thickly at this point along both sides of the old water-course.
 They went two or three miles further, and the orc-hold was hidden from sight behind them; but
they had hardly begun to breathe more freely again when harsh and loud they heard orc-voices.
Quickly they slunk out of sight behind a brown and stunted bush. The voices drew nearer. Presently
two orcs came into view. One was clad in ragged brown and was armed with a bow of horn; it was
of a small breed, black-skinned, with wide and snuffling nostrils: evidently a tracker of some kind.
The other was a big fighting-orc, like those of Shagrat's company, bearing the token of the Eye. He
also had a bow at his back and carried a short broad-headed spear. As usual they were quarrelling,
and being of different breeds they used the Common Speech after their fashion.
 Hardly twenty paces from where the hobbits lurked the small orc stopped. 'Nar!' it snarled. 'I'm
going home.' It pointed across the valley to the orc-hold. 'No good wearing my nose out on stones
any more. There's not a trace left, I say. I've lost the scent through giving way to you. It went up
into the hills, not along the valley, I tell you.'
 'Not much use are you, you little snufflers?' said the big orc. 'I reckon eyes are better than your
snotty noses.'
 'Then what have you seen with them?' snarled the other. 'Garn! You don't even know what
you're looking for.'
 'Whose blame's that?' said the soldier. 'Not mine. That comes from Higher Up. First they say it's
a great Elf in bright armour, then it's a sort of small dwarf-man, then it must be a pack of rebel
Uruk-hai; or maybe it's all the lot together.'
 'Ar!' said the tracker. 'They've lost their heads, that's what it is. And some of the bosses are going
to lose their skins too, I guess, if what I hear is true: Tower raided and all, and hundreds of your
lads done in, and prisoner got away. If that's the way you fighters go on, small wonder there's bad
news from the battles.'
 'Who says there's bad news?' shouted the soldier.
 'Ar! Who says there isn't?'
 'That's cursed rebel-talk, and I'll stick you, if you don't shut it down, see?'
 'All right, all right!' said the tracker. 'I'll say no more and go on thinking. But what's the black
sneak got to do with it all? That gobbler with the flapping hands?'
 'I don't know. Nothing, maybe. But he's up to no good, nosing around, I'll wager. Curse him! No
sooner had he slipped us and run off than word came he's wanted alive, wanted quick.'
 'Well, I hope they get him and put him through it,' growled the tracker. 'He messed up the scent
back there, pinching that cast-off mail-shirt that he found, and paddling all round the place before I
could get there.'
 'It saved his life anyhow,' said the soldier. 'Why, before I knew he was wanted I shot him, as
neat as neat, at fifty paces right in the back; but he ran on.'
 'Garn! You missed him,' said the tracker. 'First you shoot wild, then you run too slow, and then
you send for the poor trackers. I've had enough of you.' He loped off.
 'You come back,' shouted the soldier, 'or I'll report you!'
 'Who to? Not to your precious Shagrat. He won't be captain any more.'
 'I'll give your name and number to the Nazgûl,' said the soldier lowering his voice to a hiss. 'One
of _them_'s in charge at the Tower now.'
 The other halted, and his voice was full of fear and rage. 'You cursed peaching sneakthief!' he
yelled. 'You can't do your job, and you can't even stick by your own folk. Go to your filthy
Shriekers, and may they freeze the flesh off you! If the enemy doesn't get them first. They've done
in Number One, I've heard, and I hope it's true!'
 The big orc, spear in hand, leapt after him. But the tracker, springing behind a stone, put an
arrow in his eye as he ran up, and he fell with a crash. The other ran off across the valley and
disappeared.
 For a while the hobbits sat in silence. At length Sam stirred. 'Well I call that neat as neat,' he
said. 'If this nice friendliness would spread about in Mordor, half our trouble would be over.'
 'Quietly, Sam,' Frodo whispered. 'There may be others about. We have evidently had a very
narrow escape, and the hunt was hotter on our tracks than we guessed. But that is the spirit of
Mordor, Sam; and it has spread to every corner of it. Orcs have always behaved like that, or so all
tales say, when they are on their own. But you can't get much hope out of it. They hate us far more,
altogether and all the time. If those two had seen us, they would have dropped all their quarrel until
we were dead.'
 There was another long silence. Sam broke it again, but with a whisper this time. 'Did you hear
what they said about _that gobbler_, Mr. Frodo? I told you Gollum wasn't dead yet, didn't I?'
 'Yes, I remember. And I wondered how you knew,' said Frodo. 'Well come now! I think we had
better not move out from here again, until it has gone quite dark. So you shall tell me how you
know, and all about what happened. If you can do it quietly.'
 'I'll try,' said Sam, 'but when I think of that Stinker I get so hot l could shout.'
 There the hobbits sat under the cover of the thorny bush, while the drear light of Mordor faded
slowly into a deep and starless night; and Sam spoke into Frodo's ear all that he could find words
for of Gollum's treacherous attack, the horror of Shelob, and his own adventures with the orcs.
When he had finished, Frodo said nothing but took Sam's hand and pressed it. At length he stirred.
 'Well, I suppose we must be going on again,' he said. 'I wonder how long it will be before we
really are caught and all the toiling and the slinking will be over, and in vain.' He stood up. 'It's dark,
and we cannot use the Lady's glass. Keep it safe for me, Sam. I have nowhere to keep it now,
except in my hand, and I shall need both hands in the blind night. But Sting I give to you. I have
got an orc-blade, but I do not think it will be my part to strike any blow again.'
 It was difficult and dangerous moving in the night in the pathless land; but slowly and with
much stumbling the two hobbits toiled on hour by hour northward along the eastern edge of the
stony valley. When a grey light crept back over the western heights, long after day had opened in
the lands beyond, they went into hiding again and slept a little, turn by turn. In his times of waking
Sam was busy with thoughts of food. At last when Frodo roused himself and spoke of eating and
making ready for yet another effort, he asked the question that was troubling him most.
 'Begging your pardon, Mr. Frodo,' he said, 'but have you any notion how far there is still to go?'
 'No, not any clear notion, Sam,' Frodo answered. 'In Rivendell before I set out I was shown a
map of Mordor that was made before the Enemy came back here; but I only remember it vaguely. I
remember clearest that there was a place in the north where the western range and the northern
range send out spurs that nearly meet. That must be twenty leagues at least from the bridge back by
the Tower. It might be a good point at which to cross. But of course, if we get there, we shall be
further than we were from the Mountain, sixty miles from it, I should think. I guess that we have
gone about twelve leagues north from the bridge now. Even if all goes well, I could hardly reach
the Mountain in a week. I am afraid, Sam, that the burden will get very heavy, and I shall go still
slower as we get nearer.'
 Sam sighed. 'That's just as I feared,' he said. 'Well, to say nothing of water, we've got to eat less,
Mr. Frodo, or else move a bit quicker, at any rate while we're still in this valley. One more bite and
all the food's ended, save the Elves' waybread.'
 'I'll try and be a bit quicker, Sam,' said Frodo, drawing a deep breath. 'Come on then! Let's start
another march!'
 It was not yet quite dark again. They plodded along, on into the night. The hours passed in a
weary stumbling trudge with a few brief halts. At the first hint of grey light under the skirts of the
canopy of shadow they hid themselves again in a dark hollow under an overhanging stone.
 Slowly the light grew, until it was clearer than it yet had been. A strong wind from the West was
now driving the fumes of Mordor from the upper airs. Before long the hobbits could make out the
shape of the land for some miles about them. The trough between the mountains and the Morgai
had steadily dwindled as it climbed upwards, and the inner ridge was now no more than a shelf in
the steep faces of the Ephel Dúath; but to the east it fell as sheerly as ever down into Gorgoroth.
Ahead the water-course came to an end in broken steps of rock; for out from the main range there
sprang a high barren spur, thrusting eastward like a wall. To meet it there stretched out from the
grey and misty northern range of Ered Lithui a long jutting arm; and between the ends there was a
narrow gap: Carach Angren, the Isenmouthe, beyond which lay the deep dale of Udûn. In that dale
behind the Morannon were the tunnels and deep armouries that the servants of Mordor had made
for the defence of the Black Gate of their land; and there now their Lord was gathering in haste
great forces to meet the onslaught of the Captains of the West. Upon the out-thrust spurs forts and
towers were built, and watch-fires burned; and all across the gap an earth-wall had been raised, and
a deep trench delved that could be crossed only by a single bridge.
 A few miles north, high up in the angle where the western spur branched away from the main
range, stood the old castle of Durthang, now one of the many orc-holds that clustered about the dale
of Udûn. A road, already visible in the growing light, came winding down from it, until only a mile
or two from where the hobbits lay it turned east and ran along a shelf cut in the side of the spur, and
so went down into the plain, and on to the Isenmouthe.
 To the hobbits as they looked out it seemed that all their journey north had been useless. The
plain to their right was dim and smoky, and they could see there neither camps nor troops moving;
but all that region was under the vigilance of the forts of Carach Angren.
 'We have come to a dead end, Sam,' said Frodo. 'If we go on, we shall only come up to that orctower,
but the only road to take is that road that comes down from it – unless we go back. We can't
climb up westward, or climb down eastward.'
 'Then we must take the road, Mr. Frodo,' said Sam. 'We must take it and chance our luck, if
there is any luck in Mordor. We might as well give ourselves up as wander about any more, or try
to go back. Our food won't last. We've got to make a dash for it!'
 'All right, Sam,' said Frodo. 'Lead me! As long as you've got any hope left. Mine is gone. But I
can't dash, Sam. I'll just plod along after you.'
 'Before you start any more plodding, you need sleep and food, Mr. Frodo. Come and take what
you can get of them!'
 He gave Frodo water and an additional wafer of the waybread, and he made a pillow of his cloak
for his master's head. Frodo was too weary to debate the matter, and Sam did not tell him that he
had drunk the last drop of their water, and eaten Sam's share of the food as well as his own. When
Frodo was asleep Sam bent over him and listened to his breathing and scanned his face. It was lined
and thin, and yet in sleep it looked content and unafraid. 'Well, here goes, Master!' Sam muttered to
himself. 'I'll have to leave you for a bit and trust to luck. Water we must have, or we'll get no
further.'
 Sam crept out, and flitting from stone to stone with more than hobbit-care, he went down to the
water-course, and then followed it for some way as it climbed north, until he came to the rock-steps
where long ago, no doubt, its spring had come gushing down in a little waterfall. All now seemed
dry and silent; but refusing to despair Sam stooped and listened, and to his delight he caught the
sound of trickling. Clambering a few steps up he found a tiny stream of dark water that came out
from the hill-side and filled a little bare pool, from which again it spilled, and vanished then under
the barren stones.
 Sam tasted the water, and it seemed good enough. Then he drank deeply, refilled the bottle, and
turned to go back. At that moment he caught a glimpse of a black form or shadow flitting among
the rocks away near Frodo's hiding-place. Biting back a cry, he leapt down from the spring and ran,
jumping from stone to stone. It was a wary creature, difficult to see, but Sam had little doubt about
it: he longed to get his hands on its neck. But it heard him coming and slipped quickly away. Sam
thought he saw a last fleeting glimpse of it, peering back over the edge of the eastward precipice,
before it ducked and disappeared.
 'Well, luck did not let me down,' muttered Sam, 'but that was a near thing! Isn't it enough to
have orcs by the thousand without that stinking villain coming nosing round? I wish he had been
shot!' He sat down by Frodo and did not rouse him; but he did not dare to go to sleep himself. At
last when he felt his eyes closing and knew that his struggle to keep awake could not go on much
longer, he wakened Frodo gently.
 'That Gollum's about again, I'm afraid, Mr. Frodo,' he said. 'Leastways, if it wasn't him, then
there's two of him. I went away to find some water and spied him nosing round just as I turned back.
I reckon it isn't safe for us both to sleep together, and begging your pardon, but I can't hold up my
lids much longer.'
 'Bless you, Sam!' said Frodo. 'Lie down and take your proper turn! But I'd rather have Gollum
than orcs. At any rate he won't give us away to them – not unless he's caught himself.'
 'But he might do a bit of robbery and murder on his own,' growled Sam. 'Keep your eyes open,
Mr. Frodo! There's a bottle full of water. Drink up. We can fill it again when we go on.' With that
Sam plunged into sleep.
 Light was fading when he woke. Frodo sat propped against the rock behind, but he had fallen
asleep. The water-bottle was empty. There was no sign of Gollum.
 Mordor-dark had returned, and the watch-fires on the heights burned fierce and red, when the
hobbits set out again on the most dangerous stage of all their journey. They went first to the little
spring, and then climbing warily up they came to the road at the point where it swung east towards
the Isenmouthe twenty miles away. It was not a broad road, and it had no wall or parapet along the
edge and as it ran on the sheer drop from its brink became deeper and deeper. The hobbits could
hear no movements, and after listening for a while they set off eastward at a steady pace.
 After doing some twelve miles, they halted. A short way back the road had bent a little
northward and the stretch that they had passed over was now screened from sight. This proved
disastrous. They rested for some minutes and then went on; but they had not taken many steps
when suddenly in the stillness of the night they heard the sound that all along they had secretly
dreaded: the noise of marching feet. It was still some way behind them, but looking back they could
see the twinkle of torches coming round the bend less than a mile away, and they were moving fast:
too fast for Frodo to escape by flight along the road ahead.
 'I feared it, Sam,' said Frodo. 'We've trusted to luck, and it has failed us. We're trapped.' He
looked wildly up at the frowning wall, where the road-builders of old had cut the rock sheer for
many fathoms above their heads. He ran to the other side and looked over the brink into a dark pit
of gloom. 'We're trapped at last!' he said He sank to the ground beneath the wall of rock and bowed
his head.
 'Seems so,' said Sam. 'Well, we can but wait and see.' And with that he sat down beside Frodo
under the shadow of the cliff.
 They did not have to wait long. The orcs were going at a great pace. Those in the foremost files
bore torches. On they came, red flames in the dark, swiftly growing. Now Sam too bowed his head,
hoping that it would hide his face when the torches reached them; and he set their shields before
their knees to hide their feet.
 'If only they are in a hurry and will let a couple of tired soldiers alone and pass on!' he thought.
 And so it seemed that they would. The leading orcs came loping along, panting, holding their
heads down. They were a gang of the smaller breeds being driven unwilling to their Dark Lord's
wars; all they cared for was to get the march over and escape the whip. Beside them, running up
and down the line, went two of the large fierce _uruks_, cracking lashes and shouting. File after file
passed, and the tell-tale torchlight was already some way ahead. Sam held his breath. Now more
than half the line had gone by. Then suddenly one of the slave-drivers spied the two figures by the
road-side. He flicked a whip at them and yelled: 'Hi, you! Get up!' They did not answer, and with a
shout he halted the whole company.
 'Come on, you slugs!' he cried. 'This is no time for slouching.' He took a step towards them, and
even in the gloom he recognized the devices on their shields. 'Deserting, eh?' he snarled. 'Or
thinking of it? All your folk should have been inside Udûn before yesterday evening. You know
that. Up you get and fall in, or I'll have your numbers and report you.'
 They struggled to their feet, and keeping bent, limping like footsore soldiers, they shuffled back
towards the rear of the line. 'No, not at the rear!' the slave-driver shouted. 'Three files up. And stay
there, or you'll know it, when I come down the line!' He sent his long whip-lash cracking over their
heads; then with another crack and a yell he started the company off again at a brisk trot.
 It was hard enough for poor Sam, tired as he was; but for Frodo it was a torment, and soon a
nightmare. He set his teeth and tried to stop his mind from thinking, and he struggled on. The
stench of the sweating orcs about him was stifling, and he began to gasp with thirst. On, on they
went, and he bent all his will to draw his breath and to make his legs keep going; and yet to what
evil end he toiled and endured he did not dare to think. There was no hope of falling out unseen:
Now and again the orc-driver fell back and jeered at them.
 'There now!' he laughed, flicking at their legs. 'Where there's a whip there's a will, my slugs.
Hold up! I'd give you a nice freshener now, only you'll get as much lash as your skins will carry
when you come in late to your camp. Do you good. Don't you know we're at war?'
 They had gone some miles, and the road was at last running down a long slope into the plain,
when Frodo's strength began to give out and his will wavered. He lurched and stumbled.
Desperately Sam tried to help him and hold him up, though he felt that he could himself hardly stay
the pace much longer. At any moment now he knew that the end would come: his master would
faint or fall, and all would be discovered, and their bitter efforts be in vain. 'I'll have that big slavedriving
devil anyway,' he thought.
 Then just as he was putting his hand to the hilt of his sword, there came an unexpected relief.
They were out on the plain now and drawing near the entrance to Udûn. Some way in front of it,
before the gate at the bridge-end, the road from the west converged with others coming from the
south, and from Barad-dûr. Along all the roads troops were moving; for the Captains of the West
were advancing and the Dark Lord was speeding his forces north. So it chanced that several
companies came together at the road-meeting, in the dark beyond the light of the watch-fires on the
wall. At once there was great jostling and cursing as each troop tried to get first to the gate and the
ending of their march. Though the drivers yelled and plied their whips, scuffles broke out and some
blades were drawn. A troop of heavy-armed _uruks_ from Barad-dûr charged into the Durthang
line and threw them into confusion.
 Dazed as he was with pain and weariness, Sam woke up, grasped quickly at his chance, and
threw himself to the ground, dragging Frodo down with him. Orcs fell over them, snarling and
cursing. Slowly on hand and knee the hobbits crawled away out of the turmoil, until at last
unnoticed they dropped over the further edge of the road. It had a high kerb by which troop-leaders
could guide themselves in black night or fog, and it was banked up some feet above the level of the
open land.
 They lay still for a while. It was too dark to seek for cover, if indeed there was any to find; but
Sam felt that they ought at least to get further away from the highways and out of the range of
torch-light.
 'Come on, Mr. Frodo!' he whispered. 'One more crawl, and then you can lie still.'
 With a last despairing effort Frodo raised himself on his hands, and struggled on for maybe
twenty yards. Then he pitched down into a shallow pit that opened unexpectedly before them, and
there he lay like a dead thing.
 _Chapter 3_
 Mount Doom
 Sam put his ragged orc-cloak under his master's head, and covered them both with the grey robe
of Lórien; and as he did so his thoughts went out to that fair land, and to the Elves, and he hoped
that the cloth woven by their hands might have some virtue to keep them hidden beyond all hope in
this wilderness of fear. He heard the scuffling and cries die down as the troops passed on through
the Isenmouthe. It seemed that in the confusion and the mingling of many companies of various
kinds they had not been missed, not yet at any rate.
 Sam took a sip of water, but pressed Frodo to drink, and when his master had recovered a little
he gave him a whole wafer of their precious waybread and made him eat it. Then, too worn out
even to feel much fear, they stretched themselves out. They slept a little in uneasy fits; for their
sweat grew chill on them, and the hard stones bit them, and they shivered. Out of the north from the
Black Gate through Cirith Gorgor there flowed whispering along the ground a thin cold air.
 In the morning a grey light came again, for in the high regions the West Wind still blew, but
down on the stones behind the fences of the Black Land the air seemed almost dead, chill and yet
stifling. Sam looked up out of the hollow. The land all about was dreary, flat and drab-hued. On the
roads nearby nothing was moving now; but Sam feared the watchful eyes on the wall of the
Isenmouthe, no more than a furlong away northward. South-eastward, far off like a dark standing
shadow. loomed the Mountain. Smokes were pouring from it and while those that rose into the
upper air trailed away eastward, great rolling clouds floated down its sides and spread over the land.
A few miles to the north-east the foothills of the Ashen Mountains stood like sombre grey ghosts,
behind which the misty northern heights rose like a line of distant cloud hardly darker than the
lowering sky.
 Sam tried to guess the distances and to decide what way they ought to take. It looks every step
of fifty miles,' he muttered gloomily staring at the threatening mountain, 'and that'll take a week, if
it takes a day, with Mr. Frodo as he is.' He shook his head, and as he worked things out, slowly a
new dark thought grew in his mind. Never for long had hope died in his staunch heart, and always
until now he had taken some thought for their return. But the bitter truth came home to him at last:
at best their provision would take them to their goal; and when the task was done, there they would
come to an end, alone, houseless, foodless in the midst of a terrible desert. There could be no return.
 'So that was the job I felt I had to do when I started,' thought Sam: 'to help Mr. Frodo to the last
step and then die with him? Well, if that is the job then I must do it. But I would dearly like to see
Bywater again, and Rosie Cotton and her brothers, and the Gaffer and Marigold and all. I can't
think somehow that Gandalf would have sent Mr. Frodo on this errand if there hadn't a' been any
hope of his ever coming back at all. Things all went wrong when he went down in Moria. I wish he
hadn't. He would have done something.'
 But even as hope died in Sam, or seemed to die, it was turned to a new strength. Sam's plain
hobbit-face grew stern, almost grim, as the will hardened in him, and he felt through all his limbs a
thrill, as if he was turning into some creature of stone and steel that neither despair nor weariness
nor endless barren miles could subdue.
 With a new sense of responsibility he brought his eyes back to the ground near at hand, studying
the next move. As the light grew a little he saw to his surprise that what from a distance had
seemed wide and featureless flats were in fact all broken and tumbled. Indeed the whole surface of
the plains of Gorgoroth was pocked with great holes, as if, while it was still a waste of soft mud, it
had been smitten with a shower of bolts and huge slingstones. The largest of these holes were
rimmed with ridges of broken rock, and broad fissures ran out from them in all directions. It was a
land in which it would be possible to creep from hiding to hiding, unseen by all but the most
watchful eyes: possible at least for one who was strong and had no need for speed. For the hungry
and worn, who had far to go before life failed, it had an evil look.
 Thinking of all these things Sam went back to his master. He had no need to rouse him. Frodo
was lying on his back with eyes open, staring at the cloudy sky. 'Well, Mr. Frodo,' said Sam, 'I've
been having a look round and thinking a bit. There's nothing on the roads, and we'd best be getting
away while there's a chance. Can you manage it?'
 'I can manage it,' said Frodo. 'I must.'
 Once more they started, crawling from hollow to hollow, flitting behind such cover as they
could find, but moving always in a slant towards the foothills of the northern range. But as they
went the most easterly of the roads followed them, until it ran off, hugging the skirts of the
mountains, away into a wall of black shadow far ahead. Neither man nor orc now moved along its
flat grey stretches; for the Dark Lord had almost completed the movement of his forces, and even in
the fastness of his own realm he sought the secrecy of night, fearing the winds of the world that had
turned against him, tearing aside his veils, and troubled with tidings of bold spies that had passed
through his fences.
 The hobbits had gone a few weary miles when they halted. Frodo seemed nearly spent. Sam saw
that he could not go much further in this fashion, crawling, stooping, now picking a doubtful way
very slowly, now hurrying at a stumbling run.
 'I'm going back on to the road while the light lasts, Mr. Frodo,' he said. 'Trust to luck again! It
nearly failed us last time, but it didn't quite. A steady pace for a few more miles, and then a rest.'
 He was taking a far greater risk than he knew; but Frodo was too much occupied with his burden
and with the struggle in his mind to debate, and almost too hopeless to care. They climbed on to the
causeway and trudged along, down the hard cruel road that led to the Dark Tower itself. But their
luck held, and for the rest of that day they met no living or moving thing; and when night fell they
vanished into the darkness of Mordor. All the land now brooded as at the coming of a great storm:
for the Captains of the West had passed the Cross-roads and set flames in the deadly fields of Imlad
Morgul.
 So the desperate journey went on, as the Ring went south and the banners of the kings rode
north. For the hobbits each day, each mile. was more bitter than the one before, as their strength
lessened and the land became more evil. They met no enemies by day. At times by night, as they
cowered or drowsed uneasily in some hiding beside the road, they heard cries and the noise of
many feet or the swift passing of some cruelly ridden steed. But far worse than all such perils was
the ever-approaching threat that beat upon them as they went: the dreadful menace of the Power
that waited, brooding in deep thought and sleepless malice behind the dark veil about its Throne.
Nearer and nearer it drew, looming blacker, like the oncoming of a wall of night at the last end of
the world.
 There came at last a dreadful nightfall; and even as the Captains of the West drew near to the
end of the living lands, the two wanderers came to an hour of blank despair. Four days had passed
since they had escaped from the orcs, but the time lay behind them like an ever-darkening dream.
All this last day Frodo had not spoken, but had walked half-bowed, often stumbling, as if his eyes
no longer saw the way before his feet. Sam guessed that among all their pains he bore the worst, the
growing weight of the Ring, a burden on the body and a torment to his mind. Anxiously Sam had
noted how his master's left hand would often be raised as if to ward on a blow, or to screen his
shrinking eyes from a dreadful Eye that sought to look in them. And sometimes his right hand
would creep to his breast, clutching, and then slowly, as the will recovered mastery, it would be
withdrawn.
 Now as the blackness of night returned Frodo sat, his head between his knees, his arms hanging
wearily to the ground where his hands lay feebly twitching. Sam watched him, till night covered
them both and hid them from one another. He could no longer find any words to say; and he turned
to his own dark thoughts. As for himself, though weary and under a shadow of fear, he still had
some strength left. The _lembas_ had a virtue without which they would long ago have lain down
to die. It did not satisfy desire, and at times Sam's mind was filled with the memories of food, and
the longing for simple bread and meats. And yet this waybread of the Elves had a potency that
increased as travellers relied on it alone and did not mingle it with other foods. It fed the will, and it
gave strength to endure, and to master sinew and limb beyond the measure of mortal kind. But now
a new decision must be made. They could not follow this road any longer; for it went on eastward
into the great Shadow, but the Mountain now loomed upon their right, almost due south, and they
must turn towards it. Yet still before it there stretched a wide region of fuming, barren, ash-ridden
land.
 'Water, water!' muttered Sam. He had stinted himself, and in his parched mouth his tongue
seemed thick and swollen; but for all his care they now had very little left, perhaps half his bottle,
and maybe there were still days to go. All would long ago have been spent, if they had not dared to
follow the orc-road. For at long intervals on that highway cisterns had been built for the use of
troops sent in haste through the waterless regions. In one Sam had found some water left, stale,
muddied by the orcs, but still sufficient for their desperate case. Yet that was now a day ago. There
was no hope of any more.
 At last wearied with his cares Sam drowsed, leaving the morrow till it came; he could do no
more. Dream and waking mingled uneasily. He saw lights like gloating yes, and dark creeping
shapes, and he heard noises as of wild beasts or the dreadful cries of tortured things; and he would
start up to find the world all dark and only empty blackness all about him. Once only, as he stood
and stared wildly round, did it seem that, though now awake, he could still see pale lights like eyes;
but soon they flickered and vanished.
 The hateful night passed slowly and reluctantly. Such daylight as followed was dim; for here as
the Mountain drew near the air was ever mirky, while out from the Dark Tower there crept the veils
of Shadow that Sauron wove about himself. Frodo was lying on his back not moving. Sam stood
beside him, reluctant to speak, and yet knowing that the word now lay with him: he must set his
master's will to work for another effort. At length, stooping and caressing Frodo's brow, he spoke in
his ear.
 'Wake up, Master!' he said. 'Time for another start.'
 As if roused by a sudden bell, Frodo rose quickly, and stood up and looked away southwards;
but when his eyes beheld the Mountain and the desert he quailed again.
 'I can't manage it, Sam,' he said. 'It is such a weight to carry, such a weight.'
 Sam knew before he spoke, that it was vain, and that such words might do more harm than good,
but in his pity he could not keep silent. 'Then let me carry it a bit for you, Master,' he said. 'You
know I would, and gladly, as long as I have any strength.'
 A wild light came into Frodo's eyes. 'Stand away! Don't touch me!' he cried. 'It is mine, I say. Be
off!' His hand strayed to his sword-hilt. But then quickly his voice changed. 'No, no, Sam,' he said
sadly. 'But you must understand. It is my burden, and no one else can bear it. It is too late now,
Sam dear. You can't help me in that way again. I am almost in its power now. I could not give it up,
and if you tried to take it I should go mad.'
 Sam nodded. 'I understand,' he said. 'But I've been thinking, Mr. Frodo, there's other things we
might do without. Why not lighten the load a bit? We're going that way now, as straight as we can
make it.' He pointed to the Mountain. 'It's no good taking anything we're not sure to need.'
 Frodo looked again towards the Mountain. 'No,' he said, 'we shan't need much on that road. And
at its end nothing.' Picking up his orc-shield he flung it away and threw his helmet after it. Then
pulling off the grey cloak he undid the heavy belt and let it fall to the ground, and the sheathed
sword with it. The shreds of the black cloak he tore off and scattered.
 'There, I'll be an orc no more,' he cried, 'and I'll bear no weapon fair or foul. Let them take me, if
they will!'
 Sam did likewise, and put aside his orc-gear; and he took out all the things in his pack.
Somehow each of them had become dear to him, if only because he had borne them so far with so
much toil. Hardest of all it was to part with his cooking-gear. Tears welled in his eyes at the
thought of casting it away.
 'Do you remember that bit of rabbit, Mr. Frodo?' he said. 'And our place under the warm bank in
Captain Faramir's country, the day I saw an oliphaunt?'
 'No, I am afraid not, Sam,' said Frodo. 'At least, I know that such things happened, but I cannot
see them. No taste of food, no feel of water, no sound of wind, no memory of tree or grass or
flower, no image of moon or star are left to me. I am naked in the dark. Sam, and there is no veil
between me and the wheel of fire. I begin to see it even with my waking eyes, and all else fades.'
 Sam went to him and kissed his hand. 'Then the sooner we're rid of it, the sooner to rest,' he said
haltingly, finding no better words to say. 'Talking won't mend nothing,' he muttered to himself, as
he gathered up all the things that they had chosen to cast away. He was not willing to leave them
lying open in the wilderness for any eyes to see. 'Stinker picked up that orc-shirt, seemingly, and he
isn't going to add a sword to it. His hands are bad enough when empty. And he isn't going to mess
with my pans!' With that he carried all the gear away to one of the many gaping fissures that scored
the land and threw them in. The clatter of his precious pans as they fell down into the dark was like
a death-knell to his heart.
 He came back to Frodo, and then of his elven-rope he cut a short piece to serve his master as a
girdle and bind the grey cloak close about his waist. The rest he carefully coiled and put back in his
pack. Beside that he kept only the remnants of their waybread and the water-bottle, and Sting still
hanging by his belt; and hidden away in a pocket of his tunic next his breast the phial of Galadriel
and the little box that she gave him for his own.
 Now at last they turned their faces to the Mountain and set out, thinking no more of concealment,
bending their weariness and failing wills only to the one task of going on. In the dimness of its
dreary day few things even in that land of vigilance could have espied them, save from close at
hand. Of all the slaves of the Dark Lord, only the Nazgûl could have warned him of the peril that
crept, small but indomitable, into the very heart of his guarded realm. But the Nazgûl and their
black wings were abroad on another errand: they were gathered far away, shadowing the march of
the Captains of the West, and thither the thought of the Dark Tower was turned.
 That day it seemed to Sam that his master had found some new strength, more than could be
explained by the small lightening of the load that he had to carry. In the first marches they went
further and faster than he had hoped. The land was rough and hostile, and yet they made much
progress, and ever the Mountain drew nearer. But as the day wore on and all too soon the dim light
began to fail, Frodo stooped again, and began to stagger, as if the renewed effort had squandered
his remaining strength.
 At their last halt he sank down and said: 'I'm thirsty, Sam,' and did not speak again. Sam gave
him a mouthful of water; only one more mouthful remained. He went without himself; and now as
once more the night of Mordor closed over them, through all his thoughts there came the memory
of water; and every brook or stream or fount that he had ever seen, under green willow-shades or
twinkling in the sun, danced and rippled for his torment behind the blindness of his eyes. He felt the
cool mud about his toes as he paddled in the Pool at Bywater with Jolly Cotton and Tom and Nibs,
and their sister Rosie. 'But that was years ago,' he sighed, 'and far away. The way back, if there is
one, goes past the Mountain.'
 He could not sleep and he held a debate with himself. 'Well, come now, we've done better than
you hoped,' he said sturdily. 'Began well anyway. I reckon we crossed half the distance before we
stopped. One more day will do it.' And then he paused.
 'Don't be a fool, Sam Gamgee,' came an answer in his own voice. 'He won't go another day like
that, if he moves at all. And you can't go on much longer giving him all the water and most of the
food.'
 'I can go on a good way though, and I will.'
 'Where to?'
 'To the Mountain, of course.'
 'But what then, Sam Gamgee, what then? When you get there, what are you going to do? He
won't be able to do anything for himself.'
 To his dismay Sam realized that he had not got an answer to this. He had no clear idea at all.
Frodo had not spoken much to him of his errand, and Sam only knew vaguely that the Ring had
somehow to be put into the fire. 'The Cracks of Doom,' he muttered, the old name rising to his mind.
'Well, if Master knows how to find them, I don't.'
 'There you are!' came the answer. 'It's all quite useless. He said so himself. You are the fool,
going on hoping and toiling. You could have lain down and gone to sleep together days ago, if you
hadn't been so dogged. But you'll die just the same, or worse. You might just as well lie down now
and give it up. You'll never get to the top anyway.'
 'I'll get there, if I leave everything but my bones behind,' said Sam. 'And I'll carry Mr. Frodo up
myself, if it breaks my back and heart. So stop arguing!'
 At that moment Sam felt a tremor in the ground beneath him, and he heard or sensed a deep
remote rumble as of thunder imprisoned under the earth. There was a brief red flame that flickered
under the clouds and died away. The Mountain too slept uneasily.
 The last stage of their journey to Orodruin came, and it was a torment greater than Sam had ever
thought that he could bear. He was in pain, and so parched that he could no longer swallow even a
mouthful of food. It remained dark, not only because of the smokes of the Mountain: there seemed
to be a storm coming up, and away to the south-east there was a shimmer of lightnings under the
black skies. Worst of all, the air was full of fumes; breathing was painful and difficult, and a
dizziness came on them, so that they staggered and often fell. And yet their wills did not yield, and
they struggled on.
 The Mountain crept up ever nearer, until, if they lifted their heavy heads, it filled all their sight,
looming vast before them: a huge mass of ash and slag and burned stone, out of which a sheersided
cone was raised into the clouds. Before the daylong dusk ended and true night came again
they had crawled and stumbled to its very feet.
 With a gasp Frodo cast himself on the ground. Sam sat by him. To his surprise he felt tired but
lighter, and his head seemed clear again. No more debates disturbed his mind. He knew all the
arguments of despair and would not listen to them. His will was set, and only death would break it.
He felt no longer either desire or need of sleep, but rather of watchfulness. He knew that all the
hazards and perils were now drawing together to a point: the next day would be a day of doom, the
day of final effort or disaster, the last gasp.
 But when would it come? The night seemed endless and timeless, minute after minute falling
dead and adding up to no passing hour, bringing no change. Sam began to wonder if a second
darkness had begun and no day would ever reappear. At last he groped for Frodo's hand. It was cold
and trembling. His master was shivering.
 'I didn't ought to have left my blanket behind,' muttered Sam; and lying down he tried to comfort
Frodo with his arms and body. Then sleep took him, and the dim light of the last day of their quest
found them side by side. The wind had fallen the day before as it shifted from the West, and now it
came from the North and began to rise; and slowly the light of the unseen Sun filtered down into
the shadows where the hobbits lay.
 'Now for it! Now for the last gasp!' said Sam as he struggled to his feet. He bent over Frodo,
rousing him gently. Frodo groaned; but with a great effort of will he staggered up; and then he fell
upon his knees again. He raised his eyes with difficulty to the dark slopes of Mount Doom towering
above him, and then pitifully he began to crawl forward on his hands.
 Sam looked at him and wept in his heart, but no tears came to his dry and stinging eyes. 'I said
I'd carry him, if it broke my back,' he muttered, 'and I will!'
 'Come, Mr. Frodo!' he cried. 'I can't carry it for you, but I can carry you and it as well. So up you
get! Come on, Mr. Frodo dear! Sam will give you a ride. Just tell him where to go, and he'll go.'
 As Frodo clung upon his back, arms loosely about his neck, legs clasped firmly under his arms,
Sam staggered to his feet; and then to his amazement he felt the burden light. He had feared that he
would have barely strength to lift his master alone, and beyond that he had expected to share in the
dreadful dragging weight of the accursed Ring. But it was not so. Whether because Frodo was so
worn by his long pains, wound of knife, and venomous sting, and sorrow, fear, and homeless
wandering, or because some gift of final strength was given to him, Sam lifted Frodo with no more
difficulty than if he were carrying a hobbit-child pig-a-back in some romp on the lawns or hayfields
of the Shire. He took a deep breath and started off.
 They had reached the Mountain's foot on its northern side, and a little to the westward; there its
long grey slopes, though broken, were not sheer. Frodo did not speak, and so Sam struggled on as
best he could, having no guidance but the will to climb as high as might be before his strength gave
out and his will broke. On he toiled, up and up, turning this way and that to lessen the slope, often
stumbling forward, and at the last crawling like a snail with a heavy burden on its back. When his
will could drive him no further, and his limbs gave way, he stopped and laid his master gently
down.
 Frodo opened his eyes and drew a breath. It was easier to breathe up here above the reeks that
coiled and drifted down below. 'Thank you, Sam,' he said in a cracked whisper. 'How far is there to
go?'
 'I don't know,' said Sam, 'because I don't know where we're going.'
 He looked back, and then he looked up; and he was amazed to see how far his last effort had
brought him. The Mountain standing ominous and alone had looked taller than it was. Sam saw
now that it was less lofty than the high passes of the Ephel Dúath which he and Frodo had scaled.
The confused and tumbled shoulders of its great base rose for maybe three thousand feet above the
plain, and above them was reared half as high again its tall central cone, like a vast oast or chimney
capped with a jagged crater. But already Sam was more than half way up the base, and the plain of
Gorgoroth was dim below him, wrapped in fume and shadow. As he looked up he would have
given a shout. if his parched throat had allowed him; for amid the rugged humps and shoulders
above him he saw plainly a path or road. It climbed like a rising girdle from the west and wound
snakelike about the Mountain, until before it went round out of view it reached the foot of the cone
upon its eastern side.
 Sam could not see the course immediately above him, where it was lowest, for a steep slope
went up from where he stood; but he guessed that if he could only struggle on just a little way
further up, they would strike this path. A gleam of hope returned to him. They might conquer the
Mountain yet. 'Why, it might have been put there a-purpose!' he said to himself. 'If it wasn't there,
I'd have to say I was beaten in the end.'
 The path was not put there for the purposes of Sam. He did not know it, but he was looking at
Sauron's Road from Barad-dûr to the Sammath Naur, the Chambers of Fire. Out from the Dark
Tower's huge western gate it came over a deep abyss by a vast bridge of iron, and then passing into
the plain it ran for a league between two smoking chasms, and so reached a long sloping causeway
that led up on to the Mountain's eastern side. Thence, turning and encircling all its wide girth from
south to north, it climbed at last, high in the upper cone, but still far from the reeking summit, to a
dark entrance that gazed back east straight to the Window of the Eye in Sauron's shadow-mantled
fortress. Often blocked or destroyed by the tumults of the Mountain's furnaces, always that road
was repaired and cleaned again by the labours of countless orcs.
 Sam drew a deep breath. There was a path, but how he was to get up the slope to it he did not
know. First he must ease his aching back. He lay flat beside Frodo for a while. Neither spoke.
Slowly the light grew. Suddenly a sense of urgency which he did not understand came to Sam. It
was almost as if he had been called: 'Now, now, or it will be too late!' He braced himself and got up.
Frodo also seemed to have felt the call. He struggled to his knees.
 'I'll crawl, Sam,' he gasped.
 So foot by foot, like small grey insects, they crept up the slope. They came to the path and found
that it was broad, paved with broken rubble and beaten ash. Frodo clambered on to it, and then
moved as if by some compulsion he turned slowly to face the East. Far off the shadows of Sauron
hung; but torn by some gust of wind out of the world, or else moved by some great disquiet within,
the mantling clouds swirled, and for a moment drew aside; and then he saw, rising black, blacker
and darker than the vast shades amid which it stood, the cruel pinnacles and iron crown of the
topmost tower of Barad-dûr. One moment only it stared out, but as from some great window
immeasurably high there stabbed northward a flame of red, the flicker of a piercing Eye; and then
the shadows were furled again and the terrible vision was removed. The Eye was not turned to them:
it was gazing north to where the Captains of the West stood at bay, and thither all its malice was
now bent, as the Power moved to strike its deadly blow; but Frodo at that dreadful glimpse fell as
one stricken mortally. His hand sought the chain about his neck.
 Sam knelt by him. Faint, almost inaudibly, he heard Frodo whispering: 'Help me, Sam! Help me,
Sam! Hold my hand! I can't stop it.' Sam took his master's hands and laid them together, palm to
palm, and kissed them; and then he held them gently between his own. The thought came suddenly
to him: 'He's spotted us! It's all up, or it soon will be. Now, Sam Gamgee, this is the end of ends.'
 Again he lifted Frodo and drew his hands down to his own breast. letting his master's legs
dangle. Then he bowed his head and struggled off along the climbing road. It was not as easy a way
to take as it had looked at first. By fortune the fires that had poured forth in the great turmoils when
Sam stood upon Cirith Ungol had flowed down mainly on the southern and western slopes, and the
road on this side was not blocked. Yet in many places it had crumbled away or was crossed by
gaping rents. After climbing eastward for some time it bent back upon itself at a sharp angle and
went westward fox a space. There at the bend it was cut deep through a crag of old weathered stone
once long ago vomited from the Mountain's furnaces. Panting under his load Sam turned the bend;
and even as he did so, out of the corner of his eye, he had a glimpse of something falling from the
crag, like a small piece of black stone that had toppled off as he passed.
 A sudden weight smote him and he crashed forward, tearing the backs of his hands that still
clasped his master's. Then he knew what had happened, for above him as he lay he heard a hated
voice.
 'Wicked masster!' it hissed. 'Wicked masster cheats us; cheats Sméagol, _gollum_. He musstn't
go that way. He musstn't hurt Preciouss. Give it to Sméagol, yess, give it to us! Give it to uss!'
 With a violent heave Sam rose up. At once he drew his sword; but he could do nothing. Gollum
and Frodo were locked together. Gollum was tearing at his master, trying to get at the chain and the
Ring. This was probably the only thing that could have roused the dying embers of Frodo's heart
and will: an attack, an attempt to wrest his treasure from him by force. He fought back with a
sudden fury that amazed Sam, and Gollum also. Even so things might have gone far otherwise, if
Gollum himself had remained unchanged; but whatever dreadful paths, lonely and hungry and
waterless, he had trodden, driven by a devouring desire and a terrible fear, they had left grievous
marks on him. He was a lean, starved, haggard thing, all bones and tight-drawn sallow skin. A wild
light flamed in his eyes, but his malice was no longer matched by his old griping strength. Frodo
flung him off and rose up quivering.
 'Down, down!' he gasped, clutching his hand to his breast, so that beneath the cover of his
leather shirt he clasped the Ring. 'Down you creeping thing, and out of my path! Your time is at an
end. You cannot betray me or slay me now.'
 Then suddenly, as before under the eaves of the Emyn Muil, Sam saw these two rivals with
other vision. A crouching shape, scarcely more than the shadow of a living thing, a creature now
wholly ruined and defeated, yet filled with a hideous lust and rage; and before it stood stern,
untouchable now by pity, a figure robed in white, but at its breast it held a wheel of fire. Out of the
fire there spoke a commanding voice.
 'Begone, and trouble me no more! If you touch me ever again, you shall be cast yourself into the
Fire of Doom.'
 The crouching shape backed away, terror in its blinking eyes, and yet at the same time insatiable
desire.
 Then the vision passed and Sam saw Frodo standing, hand on breast, his breath coming in great
gasps, and Gollum at his feet, resting on his knees with his wide-splayed hands upon the ground.
 'Look out!' cried Sam. 'He'll spring!' He stepped forward, brandishing his sword. 'Quick,
Master!' he gasped. 'Go on! Go on! No time to lose. I'll deal with him. Go on!'
 Frodo looked at him as if at one now far away. 'Yes, I must go on,' he said. 'Farewell, Sam! This
is the end at last. On Mount Doom doom shall fall. Farewell!' He turned and went on, walking
slowly but erect up the climbing path.
 'Now!' said Sam. 'At last I can deal with you!' He leaped forward with drawn blade ready for
battle. But Gollum did not spring. He fell flat upon the ground and whimpered.
 'Don't kill us,' he wept. 'Don't hurt us with nassty cruel steel! Let us live, yes, live just a little
longer. Lost lost! We're lost. And when Precious goes we'll die, yes, die into the dust.' He clawed
up the ashes of the path with his long fleshless fingers. 'Dusst!' he hissed.
 Sam's hand wavered. His mind was hot with wrath and the memory of evil. It would be just to
slay this treacherous, murderous creature, just and many times deserved; and also it seemed the
only safe thing to do. But deep in his heart there was something that restrained him: he could not
strike this thing lying in the dust, forlorn, ruinous, utterly wretched. He himself, though only for a
little while, had borne the Ring, and now dimly he guessed the agony of Gollum's shrivelled mind
and body, enslaved to that Ring, unable to find peace or relief ever in life again. But Sam had no
words to express what he felt.
 'Oh, curse you, you stinking thing!' he said. 'Go away! Be off! I don't trust you, not as far as I
could kick you; but be off. Or I _shall_ hurt you, yes, with nasty cruel steel.'
 Gollum got up on all fours, and backed away for several paces, and then he turned, and as Sam
aimed a kick at him he fled away down the path. Sam gave no more heed to him. He suddenly
remembered his master. He looked up the path and could not see him. As fast as he could he
trudged up the road. If he had looked back, he might have seen not far below Gollum turn again,
and then with a wild light of madness glaring in his eyes come, swiftly but warily, creeping on
behind, a slinking shadow among the stones.
 The path climbed on. Soon it bent again and. with a last eastward course passed in a cutting
along the face of the cone and came to the dark door in the Mountain's side, the door of the
Sammath Naur. Far away now rising towards the South the sun, piercing the smokes and haze,
burned ominous, a dull bleared disc of red; but all Mordor lay about the Mountain like a dead land,
silent, shadow-folded, waiting for some dreadful stroke.
 Sam came to the gaping mouth and peered in. It was dark and hot, and a deep rumbling shook
the air. 'Frodo! Master!' he called. There was no answer. For a moment he stood, his heart beating
with wild fears, and then he plunged in. A shadow followed him.
 At first he could see nothing. In his great need he drew out once more the phial of Galadriel, but
it was pale and cold in his trembling hand and threw no light into that stifling dark. He was come to
the heart of the realm of Sauron and the forges of his ancient might, greatest in Middle-earth; all
other powers were here subdued. Fearfully he took a few uncertain steps in the dark, and then all at
once there came a flash of red that leaped upward, and smote the high black roof. Then Sam saw
that he was in a long cave or tunnel that bored into the Mountain's smoking cone. But only a short
way ahead its floor and the walls on either side were cloven by a great fissure, out of which the red
glare came, now leaping up, now dying down into darkness; and all the while far below there was a
rumour and a trouble as of great engines throbbing and labouring.
 The light sprang up again, and there on the brink of the chasm, at the very Crack of Doom, stood
Frodo, black against the glare, tense, erect, but still as if he had been turned to stone.
 'Master!' cried Sam.
 Then Frodo stirred and spoke with a clear voice, indeed with a voice clearer and more powerful
than Sam had ever heard him use, and it rose above the throb and turmoil of Mount Doom, ringing
in the roof and walls.
 'I have come,' he said. 'But I do not choose now to do what I came to do. I will not do this deed.
The Ring is mine!' And suddenly, as he set it on his finger, he vanished from Sam's sight. Sam
gasped, but he had no chance to cry out, for at that moment many things happened.
 Something struck Sam violently in the back, his legs were knocked from under him and he was
flung aside, striking his head against the stony floor, as a dark shape sprang over him. He lay still
and for a moment all went black.
 And far away, as Frodo put on the Ring and claimed it for his own, even in Sammath Naur the
very heart of his realm, the Power in Barad-dûr was shaken, and the Tower trembled from its
foundations to its proud and bitter crown. The Dark Lord was suddenly aware of him, and his Eye
piercing all shadows looked across the plain to the door that he had made; and the magnitude of his
own folly was revealed to him in a blinding flash, and all the devices of his enemies were at last
laid bare. Then his wrath blazed in consuming flame, but his fear rose like a vast black smoke to
choke him. For he knew his deadly peril and the thread upon which his doom now hung.
 From all his policies and webs of fear and treachery, from all his stratagems and wars his mind
shook free; and throughout his realm a tremor ran, his slaves quailed, and his armies halted, and his
captains suddenly steerless, bereft of will, wavered and despaired. For they were forgotten. The
whole mind and purpose of the Power that wielded them was now bent with overwhelming force
upon the Mountain. At his summons, wheeling with a rending cry, in a last desperate race there
flew, faster than the winds, the Nazgûl the Ringwraiths, and with a storm of wings they hurtled
southwards to Mount Doom.
 Sam got up. He was dazed, and blood streaming from his head dripped in his eyes. He groped
forward, and then he saw a strange and terrible thing. Gollum on the edge of the abyss was fighting
like a mad thing with an unseen foe. To and fro he swayed, now so near the brink that almost he
tumbled in, now dragging back, falling to the ground, rising, and falling again. And all the while he
hissed but spoke no words.
 The fires below awoke in anger, the red light blazed, and all the cavern was filled with a great
glare and heat. Suddenly Sam saw Gollum's long hands draw upwards to his mouth; his white fangs
gleamed, and then snapped as they bit. Frodo gave a cry, and there he was, fallen upon his knees at
the chasm's edge. But Gollum, dancing like a mad thing, held aloft the ring, a finger still thrust
within its circle. It shone now as if verily it was wrought of living fire.
 'Precious, precious, precious!' Gollum cried. 'My Precious! O my Precious!' And with that, even
as his eyes were lifted up to gloat on his prize, he stepped too far, toppled, wavered for a moment
on the brink, and then with a shriek he fell. Out of the depths came his last wail _Precious_, and he
was gone.
 There was a roar and a great confusion of noise. Fires leaped up and licked the roof. The
throbbing grew to a great tumult, and the Mountain shook. Sam ran to Frodo and picked him up and
carried him. out to the door. And there upon the dark threshold of the Sammath Naur, high above
the plains of Mordor, such wonder and terror came on him that he stood still forgetting all else, and
gazed as one turned to stone.
 A brief vision he had of swirling cloud, and in the midst of it towers and battlements, tall as hills,
founded upon a mighty mountain-throne above immeasurable pits; great courts and dungeons,
eyeless prisons sheer as cliffs, and gaping gates of steel and adamant: and then all passed. Towers
fell and mountains slid; walls crumbled and melted, crashing down; vast spires of smoke and
spouting steams went billowing up, up, until they toppled like an overwhelming wave, and its wild
crest curled and came foaming down upon the land. And then at last over the miles between there
came a rumble, rising to a deafening crash and roar; the earth shook, the plain heaved and cracked,
and Orodruin reeled. Fire belched from its riven summit. The skies burst into thunder seared with
lightning. Down like lashing whips fell a torrent of black rain. And into the heart of the storm, with
a cry that pierced all other sounds, tearing the clouds asunder, the Nazgûl came, shooting like
flaming bolts, as caught in the fiery ruin of hill and sky they crackled, withered, and went out.
 'Well, this is the end, Sam Gamgee,' said a voice by his side. And there was Frodo, pale and
worn, and yet himself again; and in his eyes there was peace now, neither strain of will, nor
madness, nor any fear. His burden was taken away. There was the dear master of the sweet days in
the Shire.
 'Master!' cried Sam. and fell upon his knees. In all that ruin of the world for the moment he felt
only joy, great joy. The burden was gone. His master had been saved; he was himself again, he was
free. And then Sam caught sight of the maimed and bleeding hand.
 'Your poor hand!' he said. 'And I have nothing to bind it with, or comfort it. I would have spared
him a whole hand of mine rather. But he's gone now beyond recall, gone for ever.'
 'Yes,' said Frodo. 'But do you remember Gandalf's words: _Even Gollum may have something
yet to do?_ But for him, Sam, I could not have destroyed the Ring. The Quest would have been in
vain, even at the bitter end. So let us forgive him! For the Quest is achieved, and now all is over. I
am glad you are here with me. Here at the end of all things, Sam.'
 _Chapter 4_
 The Field of Cormallen
 All about the hills the hosts of Mordor raged. The Captains of the West were foundering in a
gathering sea. The sun gleamed red, and under the wings of the Nazgûl the shadows of death fell
dark upon the earth. Aragorn stood beneath his banner, silent and stern, as one lost in thought of
things long past or far away; but his eyes gleamed like stars that shine the brighter as the night
deepens. Upon the hill-top stood Gandalf, and he was white and cold and no shadow fell on him.
The onslaught of Mordor broke like a wave on the beleaguered hills, voices roaring like a tide amid
the wreck and crash of arms.
 As if to his eyes some sudden vision had been given, Gandalf stirred; and he turned, looking
back north where the skies were pale and clear. Then he lifted up his hands and cried in a loud
voice ringing above the din: _The Eagles are coming!_ And many voices answered crying: _The
Eagles are coming! The Eagles are coming!_ The hosts of Mordor looked up and wondered what
this sign might mean.
 There came Gwaihir the Windlord, and Landroval his brother, greatest of all the Eagles of the
North, mightiest of the descendants of old Thorondor, who built his eyries in the inaccessible peaks
of the Encircling Mountains when Middle-earth was young. Behind them in long swift lines came
all their vassals from the northern mountains, speeding on a gathering wind. Straight down upon
the Nazgûl they bore, stooping suddenly out of the high airs, and the rush of their wide wings as
they passed over was like a gale.
 But the Nazgûl turned and fled, and vanished into Mordor's shadows, hearing a sudden terrible
call out of the Dark Tower; and even at that moment all the hosts of Mordor trembled, doubt
clutched their hearts, their laughter failed, their hands shook and their limbs were loosed. The
Power that drove them on and filled them with hate and fury was wavering, its will was removed
from them; and now looking in the eyes of their enemies they saw a deadly light and were afraid.
 Then all the Captains of the West cried aloud, for their hearts were filled with a new hope in the
midst of darkness. Out from the beleaguered hills knights of Gondor, Riders of Rohan, Dúnedain of
the North, close-serried companies, drove against their wavering foes, piercing the press with the
thrust of bitter spears. But Gandalf lifted up his arms and called once more in a clear voice:
 'Stand, Men of the West! Stand and wait! This is the hour of doom.'
 And even as he spoke the earth rocked beneath their feet. Then rising swiftly up, far above the
Towers of the Black Gate, high above the mountains, a vast soaring darkness sprang into the sky,
flickering with fire. The earth groaned and quaked. The Towers of the Teeth swayed, tottered, and
fell down; the mighty rampart crumbled; the Black Gate was hurled in ruin; and from far away,
now dim, now growing, now mounting to the clouds, there came a drumming rumble, a roar, a long
echoing roll of ruinous noise.
 'The realm of Sauron is ended!' said Gandalf. 'The Ring-bearer has fulfilled his Quest.' And as
the Captains gazed south to the Land of Mordor, it seemed to them that, black against the pall of
cloud, there rose a huge shape of shadow, impenetrable, lightning-crowned, filling all the sky.
Enormous it reared above the world, and stretched out towards them a vast threatening hand,
terrible but impotent: for even as it leaned over them, a great wind took it, and it was all blown
away, and passed; and then a hush fell.
 The Captains bowed their heads; and when they looked up again, behold! their enemies were
flying and the power of Mordor was scattering like dust in the wind. As when death smites the
swollen brooding thing that inhabits their crawling hill and holds them all in sway, ants will wander
witless and purposeless and then feebly die, so the creatures of Sauron, orc or troll or beast
spellenslaved, ran hither and thither mindless; and some slew themselves, or cast themselves in pits, or
fled wailing back to hide in holes and dark lightless places far from hope. But the Men of Rhûn and
of Harad, Easterling and Southron, saw the ruin of their war and the great majesty and glory of the
Captains of the West. And those that were deepest and longest in evil servitude, hating the West,
and yet were men proud and bold, in their turn now gathered themselves for a last stand of
desperate battle. But the most part fled eastward as they could; and some cast their weapons down
and sued for mercy.
 Then Gandalf, leaving all such matters of battle and command to Aragorn and the other lords,
stood upon the hill-top and called; and down to him came the great eagle, Gwaihir the Windlord,
and stood before him.
 'Twice you have borne me, Gwaihir my friend,' said Gandalf. 'Thrice shall pay for all, if you are
willing. You will not find me a burden much greater than when you bore me from Zirak-zigil,
where my old life burned away.'
 'I would bear you,' answered Gwaihir, 'whither you will, even were you made of stone.'
 'Then come, and let your brother go with us, and some other of your folk who is most swift! For
we have need of speed greater than any wind, outmatching the wings of the Nazgûl.'
 'The North Wind blows, but we shall outfly it,' said Gwaihir. And he lifted up Gandalf and sped
away south, and with him went Landroval, and Meneldor young and swift. And they passed over
Udûn and Gorgoroth and saw all the land in ruin and tumult beneath them, and before them Mount
Doom blazing, pouring out its fire.
 'I am glad that you are here with me,' said Frodo. 'Here at the end of all things, Sam.'
 'Yes, I am with you, Master,' said Sam, laying Frodo's wounded hand gently to his breast. 'And
you're with me. And the journey's finished. But after coming all that way I don't want to give up yet.
It's not like me, somehow, if you understand.'
 'Maybe not, Sam,' said Frodo; 'but it's like things are in the world. Hopes fail. An end comes.
We have only a little time to wait now. We are lost in ruin and downfall, and there is no escape.'
 'Well, Master, we could at least go further from this dangerous place here, from this Crack of
Doom, if that's its name. Now couldn't we? Come, Mr. Frodo, let's go down the path at any rate!'
 'Very well, Sam. If you wish to go, I'll come,' said Frodo; and they rose and went slowly down
the winding road; and even as they passed towards the Mountain's quaking feet, a great smoke and
steam belched from the Sammath Naur, and the side of the cone was riven open, and a huge fiery
vomit rolled in slow thunderous cascade down the eastern mountain-side.
 Frodo and Sam could go no further. Their last strength of mind and body was swiftly ebbing.
They had reached a low ashen hill piled at the Mountain's foot; but from it there was no more
escape. It was an island now, not long to endure, amid the torment of Orodruin. All about it the
earth gaped, and from deep rifts and pits smoke and fumes leaped up. Behind them the Mountain
was convulsed. Great rents opened in its side. Slow rivers of fire came down the long slopes
towards them. Soon they would be engulfed. A rain of hot ash was falling.
 They stood now; and Sam still holding his master's hand caressed it. He sighed. 'What a tale we
have been in, Mr. Frodo, haven't we?' he said. 'I wish I could hear it told! Do you think they'll say:
_Now comes the story of Nine-fingered Frodo and the Ring of Doom?_And then everyone will
hush, like we did, when in Rivendell they told us the tale of Beren One-hand and the Great Jewel. I
wish I could hear it! And I wonder how it will go on after our part.'
 But even while he spoke so, to keep fear away until the very last, his eyes still strayed north,
north into the eye of the wind, to where the sky far off was clear, as the cold blast, rising to a gale,
drove back the darkness and the ruin of the clouds.
 And so it was that Gwaihir saw them with his keen far-seeing eyes, as down the wild wind he
came, and daring the great peril of the skies he circled in the air: two small dark figures, forlorn,
hand in hand upon a little hill, while the world shook under them, and gasped, and rivers of fire
drew near. And even as he espied them and came swooping down, he saw them fall, worn out, or
choked with fumes and heat, or stricken down by despair at last, hiding their eyes from death.
 Side by side they lay; and down swept Gwaihir, and down came Landroval and Meneldor the
swift; and in a dream, not knowing what fate had befallen them, the wanderers were lifted up and
borne far away out of the darkness and the fire.
 When Sam awoke, he found that he was lying on some soft bed, but over him gently swayed
wide beechen boughs, and through their young leaves sunlight glimmered, green and gold. All the
air was full of a sweet mingled scent.
 He remembered that smell: the fragrance of Ithilien. 'Bless me!' he mused. 'How long have I
been asleep?' For the scent had borne him back to the day when he had lit his little fire under the
sunny bank; and for a moment all else between was out of waking memory. He stretched and drew
a deep breath. 'Why, what a dream I've had!' he muttered. 'I am glad to wake!' He sat up and then he
saw that Frodo was lying beside him, and slept peacefully, one hand behind his head, and the other
resting upon the coverlet. It was the right hand, and the third finger was missing.
 Full memory flooded back, and Sam cried aloud: 'It wasn't a dream! Then where are we?'
 And a voice spoke softly behind: 'In the land of Ithilien, and in the keeping of the King; and he
awaits you.' With that Gandalf stood before him, robed in white, his beard now gleaming like pure
snow in the twinkling of the leafy sunlight. 'Well, Master Samwise, how do you feel?' he said.
 But Sam lay back, and stared with open mouth, and for a moment, between bewilderment and
great joy, he could not answer. At last he gasped: 'Gandalf! I thought you were dead! But then I
thought I was dead myself. Is everything sad going to come untrue? What's happened to the world?'
 'A great Shadow has departed,' said Gandalf, and then he laughed and the sound was like music,
or like water in a parched land; and as he listened the thought came to Sam that he had not heard
laughter, the pure sound of merriment, for days upon days without count. It fell upon his ears like
the echo of all the joys he had ever known. But he himself burst into tears. Then, as a sweet rain
will pass down a wind of spring and the sun will shine out the clearer, his tears ceased, and his
laughter welled up, and laughing he sprang from his bed.
 'How do I feel?' he cried. 'Well, I don't know how to say it. I feel, I feel' – he waved his arms in
the air – 'I feel like spring after winter, and sun on the leaves; and like trumpets and harps and all
the songs I have ever heard!' He stopped and he turned towards his master. 'But how's Mr. Frodo?'
he said. 'Isn't it a shame about his poor hand? But I hope he's all right otherwise. He's had a cruel
time.'
 'Yes, I am all right otherwise,' said Frodo, sitting up and laughing in his turn. I fell asleep again
waiting for you, Sam, you sleepyhead. I was awake early this morning, and now it must be nearly
noon.'
 'Noon?' said Sam, trying to calculate. 'Noon of what day?'
 'The fourteenth of the New Year,' said Gandalf; 'or if you like, the eighth day of April in the
Shire reckoning. But in Gondor the New Year will always now begin upon the twenty-fifth of
March when Sauron fell, and when you were brought out of the fire to the King. He has tended you,
and now he awaits you. You shall eat and drink with him. When you are ready I will lead you to
him.'
 'The King?' said Sam. 'What king, and who is he?'
 'The King of Gondor and Lord of the Western Lands,' said Gandalf 'and he has taken back all his
ancient realm. He will ride soon to his crowning, but he waits for you.'
 'What shall we wear?' said Sam; for all he could see was the old and tattered clothes that they
had journeyed in, lying folded on the ground beside their beds.
 'The clothes that you wore on your way to Mordor,' said Gandalf. 'Even the orc-rags that you
bore in the black land; Frodo, shall be preserved. No silks and linens, nor any armour or heraldry
could be more honourable. But later I will find some other clothes, perhaps.'
 Then he held out his hands to them, and they saw that one shone with light. 'What have you got
there?' Frodo cried. 'Can it be – ?'
 'Yes, I have brought your two treasures. They were found on Sam when you were rescued. The
Lady Galadriel's gifts: your glass, Frodo, and your box, Sam. You will be glad to have these safe
again.'
 When they were washed and clad, and had eaten a light meal, the Hobbits followed Gandalf.
They stepped out of the beech-grove in which they had lain, and passed on to a long green lawn,
glowing in sunshine, bordered by stately dark-leaved trees laden with scarlet blossom. Behind them
they could hear the sound of falling water, and a stream ran down before them between flowering
banks, until it came to a greenwood at the lawn's foot and passed then on under an archway of trees,
through which they saw the shimmer of water far away.
 As they came to the opening in the wood, they were surprised to see knights in bright mail and
tall guards in silver and black standing there, who greeted them with honour and bowed before
them. And then one blew a long trumpet, and they went on through the aisle of trees beside the
singing stream. So they came to a wide green land, and beyond it was a broad river in a silver haze,
out of which rose a long wooded isle, and many ships lay by its shores. But on the field where they
now stood a great host was drawn up, in ranks and companies glittering in the sun. And as the
Hobbits approached swords were unsheathed, and spears were shaken, and horns and trumpets sang,
and men cried with many voices and in many tongues:
 _'Long live the Halflings! Praise them with great praise!
 Cuio i Pheriain anann! Aglar'ni Pheriannath!
 Praise them with great praise, Frodo and Samwise!
 Daur a Berhael, Conin en Annûn! Eglerio!
 Praise them!
 Eglerio!
 A laita te, laita te! Andave laituvalmet!
 Praise them!
 Cormacolindor, a laita tárienna!
 Praise them! The Ring-bearers, praise them with great praise!'_
 And so the red blood blushing in their faces and their eyes shining with wonder, Frodo and Sam
went forward and saw that amidst the clamorous host were set three high-seats built of green turves.
Behind the seat upon the right floated, white on green, a great horse running free; upon the left was
a banner, silver upon blue, a ship swan-prowed faring on the sea; but behind the highest throne in
the midst of all a great standard was spread in the breeze, and there a white tree flowered upon a
sable field beneath a shining crown and seven glittering stars. On the throne sat a mail-clad man, a
great sword was laid across his knees, but he wore no helm. As they drew near he rose. And then
they knew him, changed as he was, so high and glad of face, kingly, lord of Men, dark-haired with
eyes of grey.
 Frodo ran to meet him, and Sam followed close behind. 'Well, if that isn't the crown of all!' he
said. 'Strider, or I'm still asleep!'
 'Yes, Sam, Strider,' said Aragorn. 'It is a long way, is it not, from Bree, where you did not like
the look of me? A long way for us all but yours has been the darkest road.'
 And then to Sam's surprise and utter confusion he bowed his knee before them; and taking them
by the hand, Frodo upon his right and Sam upon his left, he led them to the throne, and setting them
upon it, he turned to the men and captains who stood by and spoke, so that his voice rang over all
the host, crying:
 'Praise them with great praise!'
 And when the glad shout had swelled up and died away again, to Sam's final and complete
satisfaction and pure joy, a minstrel of Gondor stood forth, and knelt, and begged leave to sing.
And behold! he said:
 'Lo! lords and knights and men of valour unashamed, kings and princes, and fair people of
Gondor, and Riders of Rohan, and ye sons of Elrond, and Dúnedain of the North, and Elf and
Dwarf, and greathearts of the Shire, and all free folk of the West, now listen to my lay. For I will
sing to you of Frodo of the Nine Fingers and the Ring of Doom.'
 And when Sam heard that he laughed aloud for sheer delight, and he stood up and cried: 'O great
glory and splendour! And all my wishes have come true!' And then he wept.
 And all the host laughed and wept, and in the midst of their merriment and tears the clear voice
of the minstrel rose like silver and gold, and all men were hushed. And he sang to them, now in the
Elven-tongue, now in the speech of the West, until their hearts, wounded with sweet words,
overflowed, and their joy was like swords, and they passed in thought out to regions where pain
and delight flow together and tears are the very wine of blessedness.
 And at the last, as the Sun fell from the noon and the shadows of the trees lengthened, he ended.
'Praise them with great praise!' he said and knelt. And then Aragorn stood up, and all the host arose,
and they passed to pavilions made ready, to eat and drink and make merry while the day lasted.
 Frodo and Sam were led apart and brought to a tent, and there their old raiment was taken off,
but folded and set aside with honour; and clean linen was given to them. Then Gandalf came and in
his arms, to the wonder of Frodo, he bore the sword and the elven-cloak and the mithril-coat that
had been taken from him in Mordor. For Sam he brought a coat of gilded mail, and his elven-cloak
all healed of the soils and hurts that it had suffered; and then he laid before them two swords.
 'I do not wish for any sword,' said Frodo.
 'Tonight at least you should wear one,' said Gandalf.
 Then Frodo took the small sword that had belonged to Sam, and had been laid at his side in
Cirith Ungol. 'Sting I gave to you Sam,' he said.
 'No, master! Mr. Bilbo gave it to you, and it goes with his silver coat; he would not wish anyone
else to wear it now.'
 Frodo gave way; and Gandalf, as if he were their esquire, knelt and girt the sword-belts about
them, and then rising he set circlets of silver upon their heads. And when they were arrayed they
went to the great feast; and they sat at the King's table with Gandalf, and King Éomer of Rohan,
and the Prince Imrahil and all the chief captains; and there also were Gimli and Legolas.
 But when, after the Standing Silence, wine was brought there came in two esquires to serve the
kings; or so they seemed to be: one was clad in the silver and sable of the Guards of Minas Tirith,
and the other in white and green. But Sam wondered what such young boys were doing in an army
of mighty men. Then suddenly as they drew near and he could see them plainly, he exclaimed:
 'Why, look Mr. Frodo! Look here! Well, if it isn't Pippin. Mr. Peregrin Took I should say, and
Mr. Merry! How they have grown! Bless me! But I can see there's more tales to tell than ours.'
 'There are indeed,' said Pippin turning towards him. 'And we'll begin telling them, as soon as this
feast is ended. In the meantime you can try Gandalf. He's not so close as he used to be, though he
laughs now more than he talks. For the present Merry and I are busy. We are knights of the City
and of the Mark, as I hope you observe.'
 At last the glad day ended; and when the Sun was gone and the round Moon rode slowly above
the mists of Anduin and flickered through the fluttering leaves, Frodo and Sam sat under the
whispering trees amid the fragrance of fair Ithilien; and they talked deep into the night with Merry
and Pippin and Gandalf, and after a while Legolas and Gimli joined them. There Frodo and Sam
learned much of all that had happened to the Company after their fellowship was broken on the evil
day at Parth Galen by Rauros Falls; and still there was always more to ask and more to tell.
 Orcs, and talking trees, and leagues of grass, and galloping riders. and glittering caves, and
white towers and golden halls, and battles, and tall ships sailing, all these passed before Sam's mind
until he felt bewildered. But amidst all these wonders he returned always to his astonishment at the
size of Merry and Pippin; and he made them stand back to back with Frodo and himself. He
scratched his head. 'Can't understand it at your age!' he said. 'But there it is: you're three inches
taller than you ought to he, or I'm a dwarf.'
 'That you certainly are not,' said Gimli. 'But what did I say? Mortals cannot go drinking entdraughts and
expect no more to come of them than of a pot of beer.'
 'Ent-draughts?' said Sam. 'There you go about Ents again; but what they are beats me. Why, it
will take weeks before we get all these things sized up!'
 'Weeks indeed,' said Pippin. 'And then Frodo will have to be locked up in a tower in Minas
Tirith and write it all down. Otherwise he will forget half of it, and poor old Bilbo will be
dreadfully disappointed.'
 At length Gandalf rose. 'The hands of the King are hands of healing, dear friends,' he said. 'But
you went to the very brink of death ere he recalled you, putting forth all his power, and sent you
into the sweet forgetfulness of sleep. And though you have indeed slept long and blessedly, still it
is now time to sleep again.'
 And not only Sam and Frodo here, said Gimli, but you too, Pippin. I love you, if only because of
the pains you have cost me, which I shall never forget. Nor shall I forget finding you on the hill of
the last battle. But for Gimli the Dwarf you would have been lost then. But at least I know now the
look of a hobbit's foot, though it be all that can be seen under a heap of bodies. And when I heaved
that great carcase off you, I made sure you were dead. I could have. torn out my beard. And it is
only a day yet since you were first up and abroad again. To bed now you go. And so shall I.'
 'And I,' said Legolas, 'shall walk in the woods of this fair land, which is rest enough. In days to
come, if my Elven-lord allows, some of our folk shall remove hither; and when we come it shall be
blessed, for a while. For a while: a month, a life, a hundred years of Men. But Anduin is near, and
Anduin leads down to the Sea. To the Sea!
 _To the Sea, to the Sea! The white gulls are crying,
 The wind is blowing, and the white foam is flying.
 West, west away, the round sun is falling.
 Grey ship, grey ship, do you hear them calling.
 The voices of my people that have gone before me?
 I will leave, I will leave the woods that bore me;
 For our days are ending and our years failing.
 I will pass the wide waters lonely sailing.
 Long are the waves on the Last Shore falling,
 Sweet are the voices in the Lost Isle calling,
 In Eressëa, in Elvenhome that no man can discover,
 Where the leaves fall not: land of my people for ever!'_
And so singing Legolas went away down the hill.
 Then the others also departed, and Frodo and Sam went to their beds and slept. And in the
morning they rose again in hope and peace; and they spent many days in Ithilien. For the Field of
Cormallen, where the host was now encamped was near to Henneth Annûn, and the stream that
flowed from its falls could be heard in the night as it rushed down through its rocky gate, and
passed through the flowery meads into the tides of Anduin by the Isle of Cair Andros. The hobbits
wandered here and there visiting again the places that they had passed before; and Sam hoped
always in some shadow of the woods or secret glade to catch, maybe, a glimpse of the great
Oliphaunt. And when he learned that at the siege of Gondor there had been a great number of these
beasts but that they were all destroyed, he thought it a sad loss.
 'Well, one can't be everywhere at once, I suppose,' he said. 'But I missed a lot, seemingly.'
 In the meanwhile the host made ready for the return to Minas Tirith. The weary rested and the
hurt were healed. For some had laboured and fought much with the remnants of the Easterlings and
Southrons, until all were subdued. And, latest of all, those returned who had passed into Mordor
and destroyed the fortresses in the north of the land.
 But at the last when the month of May was drawing near the Captains of the West set out again;
and they went aboard ship with all their men, and they sailed from Cair Andros down Anduin to
Osgiliath; and there they remained for one day; and the day after they came to the green fields of
the Pelennor and saw again the white towers under tall Mindolluin, the City of the Men of Gondor,
last memory of Westernesse, that had passed through the darkness and fire to a new day.
 And there in the midst of the fields they set up their pavilions and awaited the morning; for it
was the Eve of May, and the King would enter his gates with the rising of the Sun.
